Even from a writer’s point of view, the idea seems rather overblown. Writing is more of an intellectual activity, at least it always has been for me. But not with this NaNoWriMo project, my grieving woman book. For the first time, I understand the sentiment. I feel as if I am opening a vein while writing the story. Or at least picking at scabs. I thought I was moving right along with my grief, handling it well, but yesterday while writing I hit too close to the truth.
I should be studying for my 4 finals that I have this week, but instead, I’m updating this blog because I finally found the motivation to do so.
I have never been a tattoo person, even though I really like other people's ink, I could never see myself getting one. The thing is, I change my mind so quickly I would inevitably end up regretting it or wanting to change it.
Have a fabulous night or day!
“Let’s go home.”
God sees and he answers the call
The essay is more persuasive and intuitive. Oftentimes, intelligent students feel difficult when writing an essay, even when compared to classmates below their intelligence level. Actually there is no particular theory when we want to write an essay. Every person has a unique writing style. If we write the essay, which must be done first was to scrutinize the theme. The theme of what we write about. When we set up the first title, our brain will focus on the title so that our critique of the themes that have flowed in the nature of our work to be linear. To narrow down the options, consider aspects of significance (what is important for the reader) and actuality (if the theme was not too stale).
Editorial: Restraint inertia
"and I'm just a heart'
All that eating really did me in, and I ended up having half a cup of coffee for dinner. No joke. I was pretty much full for the rest of the night.
This past month, my physical and emotional PMS symptoms have been especially acute. Stress is definitely a mitigating factor as well as the physical demand made on my body, but I haven’t had the time (HORRIBLE excuse, I know) to get any massage/bodywork to help smooth me out. The water retention, bouts of anger and tummy troubles (er…hem) have been almost more than I can bear. A funny thing happened yesterday, while massaging a client with a combination of the following essential oils: roman chamomile, clary sage, sweet orange and lavender. The agitation ball I felt lodged in my chest from earlier in the day was suddenly gone as was the low grade ache I felt across my abdomen. My coloring shifted and my mood improved tremendously. I did not feel these changes in the other appointments I had done prior to the aromatherapy. Since I had been researching essential oils for another client, I went into my reference book and looked up the above oils within this concoction. All of them address menstrual and pre-menstrual related symptoms including depressed mood, cramps, breakouts, tummy troubles (er…hem), elevated blood pressure and cycle regulation.
Now, you may be asking, how the hell does a man show his interest in a woman if he doesn’t go out of his way doing romantic things for her.
made goddess
The first depiction, a Stellarium screenshot, is the best one to use as a guide for finding the correct stars. Besides the Dipper stars, there are a dozen more that trace out his main features, and all of these are either third magnitude, or on the brighter side of fourth magnitude – that is between 3.5 and 4, so they should be visible from most locations – assuming, of course, you are in mid-northern latitudes. The chart that follows gives a view of the Bear in context with the rest of the northern sky in February.
And this is the basic recipe I’ve been using for my sourdough. (This is a Dan Lepard recipe, which I found during one of my Internet trawls on a B2B site for the hospitality industry called Cater Search.)
And now, I'm off to dinner to meet the next batch of CZTs! I am SO excited and nervous!
And btw, if you'll look around the newsroom at the Dallas News' depopulating ranks over the last few years, "quality journalism" isn't doing much to keep y'all in business, either. Should newspapers knowingly profit from exploitation of minors? No, and you certainly haven't demonstrated here - by a longshot - that the Dallas Observer has done so. But if y'all want to keep printing with ink on dead trees, perhaps you shouldn't be so quick to criticize a model that's clearly catering to a substantial, monied audience and employing quite a few excellent journalists at weeklies around the country.
Mr A returned home on Monday. I know...you probably can't keep up with his movements..just imagine what it's like for me! When he went over to Kusadasi to work in March, I did try to tell him that not only would he miss his home (and me of course) but he would have to pay for a hotel to stay in, his food, laundry etc, and this would cut a big chunk from his salary. He doesn't listen to me, but after a while he realises that I am right.
Cambridge MA 02142
Friday and Saturday 17:00 to 02:00
The worst-kept secret in Washington, D.C. is that Democrats are desperate to find a way to ease Barack Obama out of running for reelection, so Hillary Clinton can receive the nomination so carelessly denied her in 2008. But how do you convince a failed narcissist to get out of the way so the grown-ups can take back the party? And how do you keep the most loyal and important voting bloc, blacks, within the tent, while shoving aside the first black president?
when everything else is poppin
“No, Hayley, I do not know that. All I know is that she needs to be home, with her parents.” She glared at her sister over the coffee table and added a harsh emphasis on that final, contested noun.
overwhelmed by submissions from the public;
(Picture thanks to Cococooks.com)
"You don't have the authority."
My last post stated my shock at not having brewed for almost 6 months. The nice thing about the rate of my brews previous to that are that I am only now drinking down those brews. I had room for some root beer again and room for the partial keg of Black Star Coop's Moontower that I sponsored. Imperial Stout - very nice!!
It is used in regards to weapons in school and applied so broadly that a kid who glued tiny, plastic solders to a hat to honor his military father was sent home because the tiny, plastic solders had guns. Primary school kids get suspended or expelled because a parent packed a lunch with cutlery so the child could cut up his or her food. Kids get suspended or expelled for teeny tiny representations of weapons that even the TSA would let pass inspection.
Monsieur Cocteau was a man of late middle-age with a neatly-trimmed beard. When I entered the cabin I heard him murmur “Ah, le gorille parlant!”, and he now addressed me directly. “Mr Bananas,” he said, “it is my pleasure to make your acquaintance. You are spoken of much in the cafés of Vieux Port.” He extended his hand, which I grasped firmly and shook briefly.
Commander, U.S. Pacific Command (‘91-‘94)
We have it ingrained into our heads that eating out is a unique and special experience that we need to take advantage of. It's not. Think to yourself how often you realistically eat out. Now I want you to think back to one time when you ate at Olive Garden and really wanted desert but you had to skip it. Do you regret it now? Probably not. The fact is, it's only a special, unique experience if you think 10 years down the road you are seriously going to still regret not eating the cheesy garlic biscuit. Otherwise, face reality. The cheesy garlic biscuit was there last time, it's going to be there next time.
All around 'tis milky white
Dick has earned Grammys, Emmys, induction in the Rock n Roll Hall Of Fame and more.
My companies remain strong, doing what we love. Our average day on market is 20 days. We accommodate a buyers request for occupancy and fast closings. We always design your home to detail with full house staging – every time. So for you interested home sellers out there, who are holding off selling your home – don’t be shy – MAKE YOUR HOME SHOW ABOVE THE REST AND USE A DESIGNER TO MAKE IT HAPPEN FOR YOU! Check out many ways to show above the rest and get that sale before anyone even knows you were on the market.
This wasn't just an ordinary Lassie though; this was one of those over-fed and overweight Lassies! Some stupid human had found it too much of an effort to throw an uneaten ice cream into a nearby bin and the Lassie was slurping on its creamy goodness. The Lassie was devouring it. Moon edged closer.....slowly!
Due to all Assassin HTPC’s being custom built and extensive 88 point quality tests being performed the product usually ships in 7-10 business days…. Read More >>
And before I knew it I had a garbage bag full of tiny jars. I COULD just throw them in the recycle bin. But they’re so CUTE! And it seems like they could be used for something. I mean… they have lids and everything. I tried to give them away on freecycle (freecycle is a post for another day – it’s the single greatest idea anyone ever thought of. After pizza.) but I kept getting no-showed.
I work until the 16th and then will have 21 days off. WHO HOO!
My favorite dog is buried in the yard
I should be excited to have more time to write, more time to dedicate to the kidlets, and time to actually sit, but to be honest I'm feeling a little lost. You'd think I'd keep up the frenzied productivity that I love and just fill it with all those things that got put on the back burner. Instead, I check the email account that suddenly doesn't have anything coming in, look at the phone that isn't ringing off the hook, and continue to ignore the basement that I still have to organize.
In any case, it’s here now, and effectively, we’re one, big, May-sized step from summer in Chicago.
The goal of RSA is that you can publish a certain large number — called your public key — and anyone can then use that key to generate coded messages that only you can read. You can basically think of the RSA system like a mail drop box: Anyone can put messages into it, but only you can get them out. There many good explanations of how RSA works online, so I won’t get into the details. The essential point is that RSA keys are products of two large prime numbers. In order to make an RSA key, a computer finds two large primes and multiplies them together. The key’s owner then publishes the product, but keeps the individual primes secret. It is using these secret primes that the key’s owner can read the messages he receives. (Of course, in practice, the key’s owner will have a computer program to do this all for him: I am not suggesting that Bruce Schneier actually hauls out a piece of paper with two 300 digit primes on it everytime he reads his mail!)
In another twist, Gandolfini himself admitted that he still has feelings for Falco, who played his wife Carmela for all six seasons of the show.
But does any of it matter?
Talk about working for the weekend... a Daddy filled weekend!
Recently I attended an event called Apronology hosted by the Costume Society of Ontario, I heard many stories from women who remembered their mother or grandmother wearing a specific apron. Joyce Cheney, who wrote a book called Aprons: Icons of the American Home, published in 2000 by Running Press, said: "The power of aprons lies in how they make us feel and what they help us remember."
Almost 15 years of bleeding me dry.
It gets up to 395 degrees and that is plenty hot for my hair, although for really thick hair you might need one that gets up to 415 degrees (like the CHI's and other more expensive brands.)
Embrace your injury, take control of your healing and restore yourself to the sport(s) you love!
Oh happy boy with untaught grace!
So, even though it sometimes suits the Establishment to portray our royal family as useful in selling the Best Of British, even though brewing is an industry of which the country can be justifiably proud, beer will be off the menu. Most people won't care - they've been whipped up into a patriotic mass orgasm by the red tops, with cheap 3 for £18 cases of lager lubricating street parties until it comes to the time to toast the nuptial couple, by which time some cheap supermarket fizz will be produced. Toast them with beer? Disrespectful! Laughable, when hard-working and innovative entrepreneurs have reinvigorated our National Drink. That's the real disrespect.
The band released a 4-song EP later in the year which is not held in very high regard by any of its members. The sound was more new wave and by this time they had added an additional guitar player. They continued to play together on a part time basis for nearly two decades, reinventing themselves and changing their name every several years from Intrynsics to Caroline No to Junkstar.
and insisted that he stay
All of this is over 11 years ago. Yes, I do miss them. I hate that I can't be there for carnival in February or for the wine fests in September. I would love to be able to just walk to my parents' house and hang out for a while.
Personally, I am freezing my hoobie off here in North Dallas today.
I'm not sure how many samples I officially tried. However, I did take notes on 19 different ones. Some good, some bad, and some great! A few really stuck out and reminded me why I love beer. Not that I needed a reminder, but it helps.
My DD is so much like her Mommy....completely independent, stubborn, determined and outgoing.
The Garmin nuvi 360 is one of Garmin’s older models that has withstand the test of time thanks to its durable design and great performance. Lets take a closer look at the Garmin 360 GPS navigator and what is has got to offer.
Logan wanted her to have a bone cake that she could eat.
He continued on...never afraid. He would run through the house and say, "My name is Danger" and his mom would roll her eyes and let him because he was just so darn cute.
What a fun couple of weeks we have been having! The kids have REALLY enjoyed learning about the different polar animals and how they survive in the freezing cold temperatures!
-Maritess.
I valued and cherished it,
Then I was uprooted from the comfort and safety of my quiet little life in conservative Greenville, South Carolina with its gentle, rolling Appalachian foothills and temperate climate and dragged across the country to entertainment-saturated, liberal southern California with its rough, jagged Rocky peaks and dry, dramatic desert climate.
The delicious meal was accompanied by a superb Mont de Ventoux wine, to make for another memorable evening. We are very much looking forward to 2012 and look forward to travelling around France with you throughout the year.... Keep an eye on our calendar and book your place for our workshops and trips as early as possible as numbers are limited for greater enjoyment. Date for our next French on your Plage meeting is on February 9th with a festival of pancakes
I don’t think the public really know who UKIP are… ‘Anti-Europe’, sure that sounds good on the face of it, but in my opinion, Europe has done more good than bad. The Maastricht Treaty outlined The Social Chapter allowing equality for all workers, whether you’re a man or woman, part-time or full-time, black or white. Is pulling out of the EU really a good thing? No, not really…
Hewlett's Daughter
Needed your take on where to get the best beef steak for dinner in Colaba? My friends and me don’t mind the quaint old settings but was wondering if New Martin’s corner will be open for dinner or no. Since, the steak on your blog from there looked scrumptious…
Dr. Beer, who has his own reasons for keeping his private life hidden from public scrutiny, reluctantly becomes embroiled in an inquiry that forces him to face the dark realities of Nazi rule. By turns chilling and tender, The Quiet Twin explores a dystopian world of social paranoia, mistrust, and fear-and the danger of staying silent.
In the days after that session, I sent GF this letter, and another of similar sentiment. But in the end, GF did exactly what I feared most, and sent me crashing to the ground. In response to my letters, she sent an email indicating that she had decided that she could not return to the counselor with me.
Just because I have an illness
Though Keith and I have not always seen eye to eye, I support him for the CCA. But he in fact inexplicably OPPOSED Texas' eyewitness ID legislation - at first agreeing to a compromise then retracting that agreement, taking a hard line, and ultimately flat-out opposing the bill on the House side.
ROGNESS Rook Scotch Ale
Once we get over the daily cable chewing and mouse hand pouncing, things settle down and we get on with it.
"blog or sew? blog or sew? sew or blog? blogorsew blogorsew blogorsew?"
I make myself a bowl of cereal and turn on the TV. My sister wanders by in her footy pajamas, heading for my mom’s room. After a few minutes they come out and go to the kitchen. It’s demanding grits and eggs again. I figure I can eat twice.
You could have learned all of that by reading Obama’s two books, by reading his extensive profiles in newspapers and magazines, by watching his well-known speeches and campaign appearances. Lou, you’re a bright guy, a successful guy who should be reading newspapers and gathering information about how to vote.
She is too big for the kiddie outfits, and the grown-up outfits are a bit...how shall I put it....
Today.. he is “concerned” not about our son.. but about my parenting. how our lack of a relationship..
H is for the horse, my boys, we all have one or two.
Black Sheep – I’m kind of speechless right now. I . . . wow. I’m so excited. Murderous genetically mutated sheep? And . . . zombies? I love New Zealand.
Back at the hotel, my brother took about ten seconds to figure out how to work the TV, and about ten minutes to figure out that everything’s in Spanish. Who would have thought? Maybe he’s learning something. Now we’re watching The Lightning Thief in Spanish. It is the single most epic thing I have ever seen.
i am entering my card and tag into the following challenges:
It’s true. It’s been a while since I’ve really seen high school friends, let alone have a deeper conversation that goes beyond “hey. what are you up to these days?” over AIM. But by holding onto these notes, I’ve been holding onto these friendships, whatever I remember about these people I spent my lunch times with, studied with at Barnes & Noble, went to homecoming and prom with… etc. These notes carried the remnants of my relationship with them, or so I thought.
“Soooophie.”
“But I made a big deal of my goal…”
In life, why are holding our old grudges? It’s a heavy burden to us…
I hope my email reaches you.
Filled with emptiness as though something cracked and leaked away
It's also highly suited to Young Adult readers, who like sci-fi along with their paranormal, or those who like a more challenging read.
It lurks in the laundry room, in the darkest corner. Its black carapace gleams dully in the winter light. Its long black tail is twined about itself, awaiting the chance to lash out at me. Its trunk, with a seemingly innocuous blunt end, leans casually against its shiny body, ready to lash out at unsuspecting victims at any moment
What dangers thou canst mak us scorn!
Reading ages: Very small. There just isn’t enough here to hold an older child’s attention.
– SEMIPALMATED SANDPIPER 6, near Blackie, Terry Korolyk
HD: 0 - 1 - 1
Mike read four episodes from ‘Oliver Twist’: Oliver’s birth, his experience of the workhouse, the intorduction of the Artful Dodger and the death of Nancy. What the reading really brought home to me was how theatrical Oliver Twist is. Dickens toured extensively, reading passages from his own books, and you could see why that would be a great thing to behold. The emotion, the humour and above all the life of the book really shone through and I have to thank Mike ever so much for that.
Obviously, there is this blog, plus “Modern Oracle Tarot” (on amazon Kindle) plus I also post to the local news site on the “Patch”. A few days ago, I shared the “Ode to Oatmeal” post with the “Patch”. The main intention of the post was to say ‘Hey! This tastes surprisingly good for something so healthy!’.
Every step taken inside the city walls of Old Jerusalem, I checked myself, aware that my foot may come to rest on one of the very same spots that Jesus, Mary, or even St. Paul stepped. Wandering through London with its contrast of modernity up against antiquity, playing the movies of the British monarchy history in my mind as I walk the grounds of Westminster Abbey or Tower Hill, it’s in a split second of heightened awareness that I know that while I have been chasing, tracking down happiness, it was my happiness that actually found me.
The next morning we ventured over to Vancouver Island, to spend a quiet relaxing weekend in Tofino. Three. Whole. Days. I got to spend with my husband uninterrupted, without thoughts of work or studying. This was enough of a gift in and of itself, however, being one to “go big or go home” the plans didn’t stop there.
We woke up at 5:15 this morning, ate breakfast (which I hardly ate, because I was nervous), and headed to the LASIK center. :)
Files torrented will be done thru traders little helper onto uTorrent 44.1k/16
That which has torn us apart in some unexpected way?
so i'm out of commission with the gym for the last 2 days - i pulled my neck and shoulder muscles - and let's just say OUCH! - so needless to say it's been 3 sleepless nights due to pain - but pain is part of the game - and i should be back hopefully tomorrow kicking ass again! - i'm already thriving to get back to my 3 hour work outs!
Survival of the Fittest: The Siberia Experiment
Can you describe to me how you run?
If you go to their site, it might be intimidating to see a shotgun style salon as the bakery. But as you go towards the back, you'll see a greenhouse type sitting around where you have a direct view of the pastry chefs making your delectable goodies, and they do have a few tables on the outside, so you can enjoy the weather and watch kids playing in the park.
Every Tuesday I will highlight an article I find that focuses on GOOD news.
My Mom has graciously offered to hand-embroider the ringbearer's pillow with our shared monogram, which I can't wait to see finished! She will also be helping to hand-embroider handkerchiefs with our monogram as gifts to those at the rehearsal party.
Pizza, planes and passover. What do they have in common? Nothing, other than being in a post together. Also, they all start with the letter ‘p’ so the title is an alliteration. Yes, I did that on purpose because I like alliterations. Don’t laugh.
Now to the Blog!!!
In 1953, Government Psychologist, Dr. William Thetford, was a Research Consultant to the Foreign Service Institute (FSI), State Department, at AmericanUniversity, Beirut, Lebanon.[37]
About a year ago, my neighbor and good friend David told me of a new restaurant and bar in Trenton that I absolutely needed to check out. So a few weeks go, I looked at my restaurant "to do" list, and headed to Trenton to give it a whirl. Unfortunately for me, I didn't check their hours first, and when I arrived at a quarter 'til 8, the kitchen was already closed. Tonight however, I left in plenty of time to grab dinner and a drink.
So, if any of the conferences listed in the linked PDF are of interest to you, be sure to "tune-in" to Durendal later this week.
To read more about Michelles journey visit her website and personal blogsite:
Ten miles wide at the base, the structure sundered a land where nothing grew. Rain never fell there, and birds did not circle in the sky. The bitter clay that comprised the desert floor remained shattered and cracked for as far as the eye could see.
Some say he lingered, hesitating just long enough at the computer screen to gaze one last time upon his high score – his highest score – and to sear it forever into his memory.
His feet finally moved, but suddenly it seemed the saint was miles from where Peredur could reach him. Peredur’s heart sank.
There is still something faintly illicit about creative writing workshops, as though we had all been let off serious scholarly work in order to think about ourselves, or if not quite ourselves, then the things our voices and imaginations can do. Talking as clearly as possible about the subject is a pleasant obligation, if not always possible. Nevertheless the simple effort of doing it has a kind of purgative effect. We carry too many mists and masks in our heads: they are our hiding places and disguises. It is natural to mist and mask, but in discussion there is no need to wear an extra mask or work in an even denser mist. I have long tried to demystify that which can be demystified. Poetry is not for magicians: it is for human beings. It is the effects that seem magical, not the poem that brings the magic about.
I'll let you know how the craziness goes today. I got new sneakers too... might have to take a photo and post it! They're HOTT. I got black cross trainers. For some reason I feel much tougher in black sneaks. I know, I'm weird.
And if i go
"Oh, one more thing", he said, standing to leave.
A lady of virtues and vices, a kiss of death, sepulchre of a mirage ;
Fortunately, Ontario schools are slowly but surely returning to former methods of instruction, after several years of plunging test scores and waves of illiterate students in high schools. Universities have, for the first time, initiated remedial English and Mathematics classes for first year students.
Check any list of the "worst album covers of all time" and you're bound to run across this little gem. Obviously, it earns its reputation from the implied cradle robbing, but a listen to the title song puts those rumors to rest.
Self-censoring, I think, would be a big mistake. I’d rather go too far and have to tone things down, than set out to be reasonably scary and always wonder if I could’ve taken things further.
Salad (without dressing) will keep in the fridge for at least 2 days.
Immigration officials in Monterrey, Mexico, arrested 11 Iraqis allegedly trying to travel to the United States with fake passports.
The base color is China Glaze Secret Peri-wink-le and I used black & white acrylic paint for the nail art. Then used Hard Candy Matte-ly In Love for the mattified look.
I took a deep breath, expecting a similar response to the previous baker. Instead, I was met with excitement! Nomeda informed us that she has had 2 years of training in specialty lacework for cakes, and that creating a design similar to my inspiration would be an awesome challenge for her! After inspecting the design, she told us that she would make the lace design itself out of fondant, instead of piping it on the cake. When it is time to cut the cake, the lace can be pulled off easily. Awesome! We decided that the lace work should be in white, and the cake itself should be a beige/champagne colored fondant to match the tree on our cake topper. I know, some of you may be thinking, "yuck...fondant tastes awful," but guess what? Nomeda imports white chocolate fondant from Switzerland. It is rolled out to be only about as thick as a few sheets of paper, and it tastes good! Typically, bakeries use a sugar fondant which is thicker, tougher, and might not be pleasant to taste. I was so happy to hear that the fondant on our cake would be edible!
21. Happy Cinco de Marzo! Oh, wait, sorry. I’ll be back in a couple of months.
They have rules of engagement.
That’s my first gaming Win this Year.
The property we are on was a campground, gas station and store at one time. The offices are in the old store/restaurant. The general manager and all of the heads of the departments have their offices is this building that I will be working in. There are a few cabins on site for managers and some of the managers have mobile homes. The college kids are in very small cabins (they look like storage sheds). These do not have bathrooms or kitchens, they basically have beds, I was told they squeeze up to four in each cabin. The website tells them they will be camping out for the summer. There is a girls dormitory inside of the National Park near the Lodge.
3: A Changing Environment
I'm taking a class with Julie Haymaker Thompson and using paper clay to make a whimsical music box. I have taken classes with Julie before an enjoy her teaching techniques and creativity. Can't wait.
The only thing in the storage box are the short pieces that aren't on ribbon reels!
I told my editor I'd have this to her "the end of June." What month is this again?
I served these patties with some rice to my family and they loved it. Here is some creative ideas that you can utilize this dish. Instead of steaming process, you can make them into big patties like hamburger patties, coat with flour and egg, and fry them in the same way. It will take longer to cook and the color will be darker but they will make gorgeous chicken tofu burger with some lettuce & and tomatoes. Or just serve these little mini patties warm as an appetizer. They are perfect to bite on.
PORTLAND, Ore. – As a thank you to loyal customers and craft beer enthusiasts, Hopworks Urban Brewery (HUB) is celebrating its third anniversary by offering $2 pints, food specials and 20 percent off all HUB merchandise on Wednesday, March 30.
Now then, The Three Kings (from Persian Lands Afar)… We sang this carol at school and it always chokes me. I can’t find a version that really encapsulates the spine-tingling quality of this. But this isn’t bad…
Kaiser-Permanente still hasn’t processed the claims correctly, and I am currently facing a $1150 bill (down from $1650). This is all over the fact that Kaiser-Permanente still has not paid for my $125 consultation, saying it was “unauthorized”. This is despite the fact that I went to the surgeon they chose, and waited over a week to get a referral for the consultation (incidentally, they promise they can do referrals in 24 hours when they are selling their services to your empoyers, but when you are a patient, good luck with that. It took me a week, and that was with daily phone calls.).
- One package ready-made pie crusts (two-9 in. circular pieces; found in fresh grocery case near canned biscuits; frozen can be used, too, but make sure to allow time for defrosting properly), or make your own pie dough recipe
star fruit
SRP: $35.99
I am not anti-txt messaging ok, however, my name is also not Ron Textall either. Me and my buddies text message each other all the time.
Parīkṣit threatened to kill Kali, but Kali took refuge of his mercy. The king agreed not to kill him, but still refused to allow him full freedom. Kali assured the king that fear would always keep him on good behavior. If the King would give Kali a limited jurisdiction Kali would stay put there and not spread anywhere else.
*lack of blogging mo-jo (most evident when reading other amazing blogs)
After that, it was off to the airport and home.
12th Floor
But my dreams are so high
Serbia's President Boris Tadic said the referendum "jeopardizes the interests" of Serbia and further complicates ongoing dialogue with Kosovo's ethnic Albanians as Belgrade tries to make some concessions toward the Pristina government, a precondition for Serbia's path to EU accession.
*Speed healing of ulcers – kills h.pylori on contact
This Town Called Fate by Stan Ridgway
10. Dog or cat person?
I have talked with Derek on the phone about it.
If I achieve all of February goals and if money permits I will get my January pedicure along with my hair highlighted. It needs to be highlighted super bad now but it's going to have to wait. My hair grows like a weed now.
It can't hurt right?
It's not a tower of freedom, because freedom implies too much individual agency. The Every city has too many people, too much mass and too much tension to have freedom. It has opportunities for those who pursue them hard enough. It does not however have a future. Only the eternal present of buildings that, for all their futurism, are hardly any taller than they were a hundred years ago.
Jason Law is coming home for Christmas and to see the girl he once loved ten years ago. But all is not how Jason left. Faith has changed and Jason will only get to discover how much.
It's 10:24 p.m. and my right hand is gently dusting the shelving as my left gingerly picks things up and places them down again. I pray, "Dear Lord, please, please, don't let me drop something precious with this throbbing, swollen grip."
a dream-time demon, devious,
I'll upload the excel spreadsheet with the 10-week schedule, acceptance letter, and any journal pages to hslaunch as we go along, in case anyone else is interested.
This might have been part of what gave you this platform to give these Asian secret societies a voice.
I've really been into mushrooms lately. I've been eating them raw in my salads, adding them to soups, and sauteing them over my food. I usually buy the little packages of sliced white or small portobello mushrooms, but this time I went for the large portobello mushroom caps and experimented to see what I could come up with.! I made this for lunch today and really enjoyed it. I ate it with a salad and had some fruit for dessert.
Some may think he should've held out to the bitter end. He might've gotten far less money in the legal process--and, I'd add, it's hardly comfortable for someone with a wife and child living alone in a building next to a construction site.
I have had a long standing interest in the Hare Krishna movement since the first time I bumped into them outside of the Spectrum arena in Philadelphia. They were distributing their magazines and selling incense on a hot summer day in July of 1975 before the rock band Yes played later that night. Through the years I've read a lot of their books and visited the Radha - Krishna Temple in West Philly a number of times, I haven't tired in keeping track of what has happened to "them" these last 35 plus years. There is something fascinating to me about this large group of American devotees that have renounced meat eating, alcohol, gambling, and sex ( other than sex for procreation), and also accepted a 16th century Bengali holy man from India, Caitanya Mahaprabhu, as the incarnation / avatar of God (Krishna). Krishna appeared as Caitanya to bring the singing and chanting of the Lord's holy name to the masses during these harsh godless times known as Kali - yuga (which we are still in). Hare Krishna Hare Krishna, Krishna Krishna Hare Hare. Hare Rama Hare Rama, Rama Rama Hare Hare.
I hope everyone enjoys their Wednesday.
Greece is bleeding from money.
Hope:(fanning herself to blow whiffs of fragrance his way) Getting any ideas?
Next thing I know, it’s 7am, crazy mommy has been contained via furry handcuffs in the depths of my mind and Linus is bright eyed and bushy tailed ready to pounce on any obstacle that comes between him and the tv remote. Good morning, Linus.
or gee, my kids eat enough fiber...
Kate Upton is near perfect. Kate Upton dancing the Cat Daddy, whatever that is...is perfect.
Clay stops and starts to walk toward me, but again Lexi, trying to be helpful, tries to catch him which sends him screaming through the shop.
Remember what Prof. Horkheimer said? He wrote: “Research would be able here to transform itself directly into propaganda.’
I wasn't going to post this photo. Fine Cooking won't be asking me for permission to reprint it, that's for sure. I'm just keepin' it real, and so here it is. Remember the ramekin that I accidentally spilled water in? This is it. Craterville, after scooping out the pool of hot water from the middle. As for the color... well... it's not attractive. I admit it. It reminds me of... well, I raised a baby. That's all I'm sayin'. As for oiling the ramekins, I'm not sure if that's necessary. It's spooned out easily, and clean up was a snap.
Tattered Angels Glimmer mist - Apple, Patina clear
-Loved this.
All intense beers are not created equally. Beer geeks love big beers because they do have intense flavors, yet finding the right balance is tricky. It's easy to make a good IPA; hard to make an exceptional one. I've now had two bottles on separate evenings, and my reaction was the same both times--the second the beer hits my tongue, it seems like a fully realized, perfectly harmonious beer. I can't call it a classic after just two bottles, but if I keep having that same reaction, Inversion will definitely be due for an upgrade.
I don't think we're lumped in with the others. Not having the "bam factor" as the above poster suggested isn't something an agent can overlook just because we followed instructions and completed the minimum requirements. I've made huge mistakes in querying--pretty much, you name it and I've goofed. I don't intend to make mistakes again, but I'm human and Murphy is not my friend. The one mistake I won't ever make again is assuming that agents will automatically be able to divine the brilliance of my manuscript, like Karnac the Magnificent, through some magical means. I have to show them, clearly and convincingly.
Theychatted a lot and David offer to live together. So they started live togeter. They felt happy.
I grew up in West Yorkshire, lived in Edinburgh for twenty years and now live in Coventry. I used to be a university lecturer and researcher in cognitive science. I have two grown-up children and I have wanted to write all my life. I made sporadic attempts at it when I was younger but finally got down to doing it seriously when I took early retirement in 2006.
my daughter soph - a little pine dresser !
Not everything in life can be planned, scheduled, pre-determined, arranged, or any other word with the same meaning. Things are going to happen to us and to those around us, and sometimes it will be good and other times it unfortunately won’t be. So where does that leave us, you may ask.
Maintenance of your bicycle is very important if you want to keep both your bike & yourself healthy. By keeping the your bike clean it’ll last longer, because the gravel & dirt that sticks to the different parts will eventually wear them down. Two days ago I changed the cassette on my bike because the cogwheels were worn down. While I was at it I also changed the brakes, brake wires & chain.
! Procedural Fairness wrt application of Disciplinary Code of Conduct
A creepy feeling swept over me. I remembered the dream I had. Suddenly, I felt inexplicably afraid.
4. Allow to cool for at least 10 minutes.
BIGBANG will soon be going to New York to shoot a music video. They will be spending a lot of money to make it grand-scaled. Though YG has been careful about spending a lot of money, it’s time for BIGBANG to take off again so he won’t be too careful this time. YG has always been focused on quality over quantity. From 1TYM, BIG MAMA, SE7EN, BIGBANG and 2NE1, YG has always been very confident about their music. This is one of the reasons why he kept BIGBANG back while all other companies were having hallyu-concerts around the world.
4. If I have to explain number what to do for him at the number four mark then you need to stop reading this altogether and take a long look in the mirror. And be ashamed.
Pour the sauce over the fritters. The dish keeps in the fridge for a day or two, if you wish. Bring it back to room temperature, erring a bit on the colder side when ready to eat.
Although all of the 17 projects are important, the following announcements were especially significant in terms of jobs and investment. In Statesville: Providencia USA, 250,000 sq ft, $133 million invested; and Lowes Planogram training facility, 298,000 sq ft, $10.4 million invested. In Mooresville: motorsports related announcements adding up to 319,000 sq ft, $34.5 million invested; Carolina Beer and Beverage, 300,000 sq ft, $11 million invested; and Lakefield Corporate Center, 250,000 sq ft, $15 million invested.
I sprinkle a little cayenne when it is still hot from the oven. I do not add the cayenne to the marinade, because I think it burns easily and gets a bitter taste, so I wait for this exact moment to sprinkle some..
When I look over at Brycen's birthday ticker on the side of our blog I see a little boy playing in the sand going across the little calendar. The ticker I had for him before he turned two depicted a growing baby in a high chair covered in food. In one day after changing Brycen's countdown ticker the baby grew into a boy. And that's how I'm feeling about Brycen these days! He's out of nowhere acting like a little kid and not so much a baby anymore. It's one of those things that makes me sad, but I'm also loving watching him grow up. It's also confirmation that I'm definitely not done having children (obviously). I need a newborn around again!
mounting an inner end of the stairway between the end beams on the inner frame such that the stairway is foldable between the collapsed and extended positions when the inner frame is in the in-use position.Analysis
5. i have used the red version of this barcelona-like milano black leather ottoman in two different design plans, and have seen them in person. they are solid, and are a really great size. i especially love seeing them in a pair, side by side.
One of the activities they spent the majority of their time in was also one of the most physically demanding: foundation pours. Of which they did SEVEN! Additionally, they dug drainage trenches, cut and bent rebar for support pillars, plastered walls, and painted both interior and exterior surfaces. Yet, even given all of that, one team member commented afterward, “We could have done so much more.”
She may have even suckered the mama of the house, too.
Of course, their assessment was incredibly costly as Cho went into a classroom just hours later, shooting and killing 30 students and ultimately himself. Not only was this assessment factually incorrect as no connection between Cho and the initial victims was ever made, it was also fundamentally false in their assumption that a “domestic incident” is always isolated, targeted and somehow a non-threat to the rest of society.
He also admitted being part of previous EDL protests in Newcastle, Dudley, Stoke, Bolton and Bradford.
Do I have an assignment to cover a story and be onsite at 8:30 a.m. — (and go to a late night concert that very same night)? No problem.
Really and truly, we are so blessed and fortunate to have caught this before leaving the hospital. With how weak Zoe is, this infection could have been fatal if not treated right away. If we had been home, who know's if we would have down-played her symptoms or been able to recognize the severity of her discomfort. We'll never know... but we will know that we were and are very lucky to be where we are, in the care of such great doctors, nurses and various therapists... all working so hard to give Zoe the best fighting chance.
It's that time of year again . . . Back to School! We have already started school at our house - everyone was so excited when we received our curriculum that we just couldn't wait to start! So let's make a card with a back to school theme - whatever that means to you! :)
As you all know by now I love adding bows to cakes. I've always used real ones but this time I thought I'd have a go at making a fondant bow which I've never done before. I let them dry for two/three evenings (honestly I can't remember which I think I might be slightly hysterical from all the baking) and it worked brilliantly which I really didn't think it would. I ran some more fondant around the end of the first tier at the bottom and stuck the bow on the front with two extra ribbon pieces running down the front. I'm not so sure I could do this ribbon too much on a giant cupcake, but on bigger cakes I think I'll be doing this a lot now! I would suggest making a few bows, I did, as I've heard horror stories about them collapsing!
So let’s take a peek at the post again:
Because the class on November 5 was cancelled, our only meeting for the month, on November 17, was our Westland Ward Bean Fair. We opened the meeting with a bean bag toss in which everyone told something they knew (or didn’t know) about beans and/or a bean story, memory, or experience. Janni O. and our stake food storage specialist taught us about types of beans and how to store, pick, cook, and can beans. We had samples of a variety of beans for attendees to taste. We also invited ward members to bring a bean dish to share so we could try out different beans and recipes. Many contributed their recipes so that we could make them available to ward members. We had a judge who chose “the best” of several different varieties of foods made with beans and we awarded prizes. We also took orders and payments for a “Bean Run” to the storehouse, bringing back many pounds of beans, dividing them, and making them available for ward members. Looking back, we think this was probably the most successful meeting of the year.
I bought a black with holo glittters and the green duo chrome. In all honesty I can't remember the names of these polishes...they subscribe to the name our polish with numbers school of thought... I'm useless with numbers! There is no way I'm remembering that.
Gainsborough
But if you don't have time to enter...
c) A pet-assassin-sympathizer who doesn't deserve any of my chocolate chip cookies anyway.
Sales, down; gross margins, down.
In Unit 1 fresh water is being continuously injected into the reactor pressure vessel through the feedwater line at an indicated flow rate of 6 m3/h using a temporary electric pump with off-site power.
The back is covered with a map of the United States followed with a layer of pattern tissue to mute the colors of the map (love the lines). Next I began to fill the tiny compartments . . . each one contains bits and pieces of this and that, each one tells an entire story on its own.
As a writer of non-fiction I can't help but harbour a little chip on my shoulder. Real writers, it seems, do fiction. This must be true - look at how many more prizes there are for fiction writers than non-fiction. What's more, compare the amount of publicity the big fiction prizes get against the handful of non-fiction, not to mention the fawning coverage from presenters in the media.
Jonjo O’Neill (born April 13, 1952) was a highly successful jump jockey and has established himself at the top of the training ranks. In spite of an appalling list of injuries, he was champion jockey twice (1977/78 and 1979/80), and he set a then record for a season of 149 winners in his first championship year. The most sensational moment of his riding career came when he won the Cheltenham Gold Cup on Dawn Run in 1986 as the mare became the only horse to win that trophy after having previously taken the Champion Hurdle (1984), again with O’Neill in the saddle. He also won the Gold Cup on Alverton in 1979, though he had a dreadful record in the Grand National, in which he never completed the course in spite of having eight rides. He retired from the saddle at the end of the 1985/86 season and, having survived lymphatic cancer not long after that, started training near Penrith, Cumbria, in 1987. He forged a reputation with horses such as Vicario Di Bray, winner of the 1989 Champion Hurdle Trial at Haydock, and Legal Right, who landed the Grade Three Tripleprint Gold Cup at Cheltenham in 1999 and went on to capture the BGC Silver Cup at Ascot as well as the Grade Two Tommy Whittle Chase. He moved to his present base at Jackdaws Castle in Gloucestershire, not far from Cheltenham, when the yard was bought by owner J P McManus in 2001. In 2010, he finally broke his Grand National duck when saddling Don’t Push It to victory for McManus, who had been trying to win the race since
Back in the glory days when movies about the exploits of newspaper people were all the rage, it went without saying that you needed an editor. Great classic films are filled with bits featuring reporters and editors wrangling over assignments, yelling at, manipulating, and threatening each other – and later, commiserating over drinks. Producers needed the conflict that an editor-reporter relationship brought to the storyline; they needed an editor as a plot device. But those movies also reflected reality. Writers creating stories for mass consumption really did need someone to give them assignments, to vet their stories, and to make them work harder.
at Media Theater
Don’t wuss out
C.B. & Potts Big Horn Total Disorder Porter
“No, no.” Christian chuckled, walking over to the couch. “I’ll do it.” He grabbed one of the girls closest to him, waving his hand over her face and putting her in a trance. Pulling on her arm, Christian motioned for her to sit on her knees in front of Addison. “Addison.” Christian sat down next to Addison on the couch, picking up her limp body and holding her in his lap. “Are you hungry my love?”
So, in one afternoon we get three lead stories? Will there be no day that I can log on and be able to say, nothing interesting to report today folks…the government normal.
Cut the Rope Lite: a super fun, cute, entertaining physics puzzle game - we may have to shell for the full version of this since we keep running through the early puzzle set;
I had to make a quick run to Pier 1 yesterday for some potpourri. Let me explain. Ya know when you don't have much to do, as in not wanting to start major and/or messy projects that you can't clean up in a hurry, you have way too much time to dwell on little issues. Well, that would be me right now. With the house for sale, I'm nitpicking about everything. One of my little quirks (or obsessions), is over house-smells. I am totally addicted to candles, diffusers, etc; whatever is going to make our home smell good. Knowing that we could get called away in the middle of the night and having to leave the house all closed up, I started obsessing about how the house might smell without my daily ritual of burning candles & spraying room freshener. Decided potpourri would be the best answer and Pier 1 has some that I really like. So off I went to one of my fav stores. Found some great potpourri & diffuser oil, Citrus Cilantro, & then took a quick spin through the store. I'm not supposed to be buying things that will have to get packed up soon, but I couldn't resist. Besides, they were table linens -- so easy to pack.
Wyn Kidger (MBI) 626
i always lie
BrewTrackr Lets You Keep a Running Tally of Your Favorite Beers – I’m not big on to-do lists (or lists in general), but I keep one list updated pretty religiously: my favorite – and least favorite – beers.
Mountain Breeze Campground. Family owned & operated by our long-time friends, Mountain Breeze is located on River Road right on the banks of the Guadalupe River. Offering cabins, RV sites, and tent camping, these guys are also your full source for tubes and rafts for your trip down the river. Other amenities include fishing, lighted volleyball & horseshoe pits, and hot water showers. Their sports bar & grill has a deck overlooking the river. If you like to camp or you want to float down the Guadalupe…this is your place!
The Microsoft news seems to be largely being reported as being Microsoft looking at getting a stake in the ebook and digital content world. It looks like it potentially links the Nook ebook content into the microsoft operating system world and puts Microsoft in the same space as Apple and Amazon. There’s an interesting quote on the BBC website “Our complementary assets will accelerate e-reading innovation across a broad range of Windows devices, enabling people to not just read stories, but to be part of them,” said Andy Lees, president at Microsoft. And that seems to me to be envisaging an e-content experience that is far beyond current ebook look and feel.
So I’m sitting in the Ernesto Cortissoz International Airport in Barranquilla, Colombia near the warm Caribbean sea. The airline’s gate hostess just made a squawky announcement. And judging by the groans of the people around me, our flight’s been delayed for the second time this morning.
Anika Bowles
I’ll show you some more of mine soon, but both Traci and I had to pick up this cutie from IKEA:
Ø Passport.
In the end, we had a really great weekend and were able to salvage the rugs.
Can you visualize cedar boughs draped and swagged across her for Christmas?
AP/Yahoo Finance, 04/03/2012
to hold the hand inside you in a sun-setting dark
Plus that, he didn't need meds at home. Did I say NO RITALIN? No ritalin to keep him out of a full time special ed classroom, this here kid with his high IQ.
Review: Mainly, this software seems appropriate for those who have tons of notes about a story and need to organize them. I wouldn't be a fan of writing a whole manuscript with this program even if I could.
"Oh yeah," I answered.
I couldn’t help but feel this
Onion - 1 small, finely chopped
If we are to accept the previous logic, this would mean that the “righteous men” referred to were, per se, heterosexuals.
Bread From Heaven: Linus was Peter’s successor according St. Irenaeus, writing between 175 and 190, not many years after his Roman sojourn, enumerates the series from Peter to Eleutherius (Against Heresies III.3.3; and Eusebius, Church HistoryCh 6). His object, as we have already seen, was to establish the orthodoxy of the traditional doctrine, as opposed to heretical novelties, by showing that the bishop was the natural inheritor of the Apostolic teaching. He gives us the names alone, not the length of the various episcopates.
The Strong Ales look very typical. This is the type of beer that outside Scotland was called Scotch Ale. The stronger, Younger's No. 1 style. 7 - 8% ABV, dark brown and sweet. I know Bernard's was sweet. Because there's a note on the flavour in the Usher's Gravity Book entry for the 1929 version: "Pleasant. Very sweet." That's a real compliment compared to the comments made on most of the other beers analysed. There's barely a good word said. The beers marketed as Scotch Ale in Belgium are probably the closest match you'll find today.
(Note: All pictures may be enlarged by clicking on them.)
Although I spent most of the weekend studying, I went to dinner Friday night with some good friends and Woodser on Sat. night. We went to Yamato's, one of my favorites!
Have you betrayed anyone? I’m afraid I have, one way or another, based on the dictionary’s definition of the word “betray“. No, I did not deliver anyone to an enemy. I have, however, shamelessly broken someone’s trust and confidence in me.
icono plastics – plasticity of time
Yoochun look so nervous. He fix his tie and his suit. He look at the clock, he sighed. He ready to go to the company.
Whether the after life is more like the movie “Defending Your Life,” “The Sixth Sense,” or “Bill and Ted’s Bogus Journey.”
“Ask the lady, she knows I was here.”
I went to Secretary of State (our version of DMV) to renew my license. Ugh. I've never seen so many people that looked like the crawled out from under a rock. Lots of mullets, a older woman with absolutely filthy clothes, tons of very LARGE tattoos, people that stank like smoke, and people that were just totally clueless.
If you can bring yourself to destroy the beauty of the cake, cut it into 10-12 slices !!
They had a joke about having played every club in town once, mainly cuz it wouldn't go over too well and most places wouldn't ask them back. But they continued to tread on and eventually developed their own crowd. A big catalyst for that was getting to open up for the Ramones when they played the Electric Ballroom in mid-77, and then six months later they got the opening slot for the Sex Pistols at the Longhorn Ballroom during their landmark US tour. Both of those gigs were secured by a new bass player named Clarke Blacker who had taken over for Pierre after he departed due frustration with the band not achieving greater success. Following the Pistols gig, Clarke decided to leave the band and take on more managerial duties and in stepped Bob Childress.
If you confirm to these proportions, and follow the correct training regime, you will, of course, find it much easier to achieve the ‘body beautiful’. If you do not conform to these proportions don’t worry too much - judicious training methods can make up for any little imperfections.
What I want is God’s approval! Not man’s approval, Amen!
#2: The devil with you! "The Howling Man" is an old-fashioned ghost story at its best. Penned from the dark mind of the amazing Charles Beaumont, this one could easily work just as well as a radio drama. But thank goodness we have the benefit of the realm of sight, because the stormy atmosphere and solid performances from H.M. Wynant and genre favorite John Carradine help to sell this story of Evil incarnate among us. This one always gave me chills as a youngster and taught me that the scariest things that howled weren't werewolves...
First, I think it is important to let you know who I am. I am young, well-educated, and female. I am a mother, a wife, and a professional. I am a member of my neighborhood association. I vote in local, state and national elections. I am well informed, and follow both the mainstream and alternative media. I attend church regularly (Unitarian Universalist) because I value the community and the values of social justice it supports. I am a home owner, a taxpayer, and an engaged citizen.
Tuesday was another busy day from start to finish. We spent the first half of the day at an orphanage called the Robin’s Nest Children’s Home. There were a number of kids ranging from 2 months to 12 yrs old. I think our students really enjoyed playing with the kids there. Apart from playing with the kids, the guys helped out in their new building that was under construction called ‘Jake’s House’. The setting of this place was amazing. It sat on top of a mountain so you could look out for miles in every direction. It was really beautiful! I think we all wanted to take a child home with us by the time we left.
I am SO excited to have the opportunity to host a giveaway for I See Me! I See Me! very generously offered to sponsor a giveaway for a copy of My Very Happy Birthday! The winner can choose to receive either the girl’s or boy’s book. Please fill out the Rafflecopter form below to enter!
Beatles Strawberry fields UK
I just want her to realize and acknowledge that her actions could have had much more severe and devastating consequences than just two damaged mailboxes. I could have two children still recovering from injuries or possibly dead because of the choice she made.
Back to the crafty mess... It took me no less than the best part of 3 weeks to get on top of the 'sorting' and tidying up, and afterwards, I could even sit down again on the sofa to watch TV and relax with my sweet cat Katie Kitten on my knee. There I was wrapped up warmly in my slanket with the heating cranked up of course!
Wash and soak the chenna dal and toor dal for 2 hours. Strain the dals and grind them coarsely along with red chilliies, curry leaves, green chillies without adding water. Add salt, hing and 1 tsp fennel seeds to the coarsely ground paste and mix well. Make small balls out of it and steam them in a pressure cooker for 5 minutes or until the dumplings are half cooked. Do not cook it fully or over cook the dumplings. This might prevent the dumplings to get fully soaked in the gravy.
One reason I love Anne Perry is that her work is tremendously well researched. She also doesn't dumb down her language to the reader. There are still a few terms she used that I'm quite sure were common in that period that I have little idea what they mean.
I had to stifle my laughter. But, really, I felt sorry for the guys at the counter. They happen to be young guys working in this store - really nice, and get the job done, but, honestly a little too nice with a customer like this. I wondered how many hours she had been at that counter...and how many trips she had made from her home to the paint store and back. And how many painters were waiting for her at home while she struggled to pick the right colors.
net fabric for the year: - 4 yards ~used~
I should know since I have carried that stigma for many years, having lived there for close to forty years. In fact I know very few Afrikaners who have not carried the heavy burden of that stigma in one way or another. The world for some reason has decided this is it. This is the lowest level any society could ever descend to, notwithstanding the fact that we basicaly inherited the system of racial segregation from our colonial past.
Like the way a transgressor runs when no one pursues him, the Jonathan administration recently rolled tanks to the Gani Fawehinmi Freedom Park at Ojota where Nigerians gathered in millions in January to assert their dignity as a people. This is at best a panicky response by those who have cornered our collective patrimony and are scared of the questions we shall be asking. The regime portrays itself in a comical light to think that Ojota is the only space in Nigeria where the people of Nigeria can express their anger peacefully against the brigade of thieves running our country through open theft of our money. More importantly, the knee jerk pre-emptive action response is the thermometer with which its democratic temperature is to be gauged by the whole world.
When Heaven and Hell are met,
Have a fantastic Christmas folks!
By The Tame Otter bridge there is a notice that gives the opening times of Hermitage Lock. It advises to ring for use this time of the year, so it was reverse back through the bridge to note the telephone number. There is talk that the dry dock here will soon be back in business, if its true then it will be a great asset to the area.
yes, I say again, with emphasis, loud.
12. Zoot Allures (6:25)
I have not historically been a volunteer, or to have a propensity to help wtih charities. This started to change last year when I felt the pull to give back to those who are in less fortunate situations than I am. Last year I grew my hair for a year, cut it into a beautiful mullet, and raised over $1800 for KidSport. I was proud of that, and am proud of my actions today.
What a stupid, clueless f. ing city worker. THIS is what’s wrong with our country.
Once I got in, I began to regret my decision to join the group. Everyone in the class was either a Junior or Senior, and I am a lowly Freshman. Here I am invisible! I wasn’t part of any group within the class and I was just too shy to ever buddy up to anybody within the class, so I was pretty much always sitting alone in my chair. I’d wait for the next song and either enjoy what we were singing or just wait for it to get over. A skill only kids like me were really good at.
We are generously sponsored by Delicious Doodles - so for your chance to win a fab prize join us this week and share what lives at the bottom of your garden!! bx
Micro’s products offer our customers quality, reliability, accuracy & durability. In addition to making and selling quality precision instruments, Micro is committed to a standard of customer service – including competitive price & knowledge, courteous technical support that generates and sustains long term relationship.
KRISSY: Massacre. It’s when you attack the other side despite the ongoing peace talks and existing ceasefire. Kaya demoralized ang mga soldiers.
“I do,” Sebelius said, “and I defer to our lawyers to give me good advice on the Constitution. I do not pretend to be a constitutional lawyer.”
I won't lie and say that I am an early riser. I really do enjoy my sleep. However, before if I got up at the crack of dawn there would be plenty of things to fill my time before it was time to sleep again. In the past 10 1/2 weeks there isn't much to do to fill my time. Honestly, I would rather sleep in as late as possible just to make the day go by a little bit quicker.
alas, I do not think it is
Cover. There is a variety of covers available, but what I really like about the cover is how sturdy it is. It's like the cover of a hard-bound book and feels virtually indestructible, and it's not just because the paper inside is so thin by comparison. I do have one small complaint. That's the inside front cover, which explains the environmental benefits of the sugar-cane based paper. I tend not to put much stock in green claims because I find they tend to be pronounced in a vacuum without mentioning offsetting environmental downsides.
What's the problem, you ask. It's the color vs. tone structure. Look at the cast shadows of the fire escape in the earlier versions. They have a lot of blue in them, and feel much lighter and airier. Toward the bottom of the painting, the shadowy areas are much more tonal, dark, and moody. This is a conflict of light conditions that doesn't make very good sense, even accounting for artistic license.
There are several books I know of that describe the essence of unschooling without using the word. Maybe the authors didn't want to use the word. Maybe they didn't know the word. Maybe they didn't know that when they were writing about what they were writing about, they were also writing about unschooling.
"To prove that Huggies diapers and wipes can handle anything," the female voice-over begins, "we put them to the toughest test imaginable -- Dads." In other words, as a consumerist.com headline put it, Huggies diapers are so good, even dads can't use them wrong.
One to wake you up. Two to get your attention. Three to make you alert. Four to exert a reaction. Five to make you get off the couch. Six to rile you up. Seven to really piss you off. Eight to make you shout. Nine to make you reach for the gun, the baseball bat, whatever defensive tool you think you need. Ten to make you open the front door. Eleven because it's loud. Twelve because I have more in my hand. Thirteen because you'll get superstitious and duck. Fourteen because that's how old you behave. Fifteen because . . shit, because it's a nice round number divisible by five and three. Sixteen because I wish I was. Fuck it, have the remaining handful . . 20 to shatter your facade, expose your narkiness, shit you to tears, bruise your two faces.
“RACISM AGAINST GREEKS”
And that, folks, was just one of my abundance of awkward moments. Come on by and visit me sometime at http://www.shesaystomato.blogspot.com/ and I'll be sure to regale you with the tales of many more!
Sunday, May 13: all-star cast of Richard Payne (St. Lucia), Joel Widmaier and Jean Caze (Haiti), Sonny Troupe (Guadeloupe) and of the The Wespe Pour Ayiti Project; Hugh Masekela
Say what you will about Lady Gaga, the girl can create moments. Leaps and bounds ahead of the rest of her 2011 album, this song was an instant classic the minute Haley Reinhart opened her mouth to sing it on Idol and Gaga followed with a performance of it the following week. Beautiful piano, screamtastic chorus, just… so incredible. Everyone needs to get off their hipster high horses and embrace the Gaga.
There are two boys, on the right, and one girl pictured on the left. The dark one is simply adorable!
Do-do-do what do I want to eat?
Natural justice: Under Article 135(2) no public servant may be dismissed or reduced in rank without being given a “reasonable opportunity of being heard”.
Once the car was parked, we once again donned our rain gear, and walked north to Deschutes, where the Dissident had just finally been re-released. We grabbed a table, and ordered a round, which we made our way through and collectively decided wasn't quite good enough to hang around for a second of. We learned that bottle sales had been brisk earlier in the morning, and that if we wanted bottles direct from the brewery, we'd have to act quick, but with everything else going on, we decided to pass on the opportunity... despite having eagerly anticipated this release ever since running out of bottles of the 08, two years ago.
We'll see if they actually make it on to the plate with the rate they're disappearing! Mental note for next year: make them last so they don't sit around too long!
And down to the nitty gritty
If technological advance only made things easier and not also faster, I would just as likely be writing this blog entry in the year 200,010 as here in 2010! Furthermore, many technologies today are being specifically used for expediting technological advance. For example, Moore’s Law states that our computing power grows exponentially, doubling every two years. Given our modern reliance on the computer, that basically means that we are racing toward the future faster than ever before, and with ever increasing speed!
I used to think that it would’ve been better to get my education over with before having kids. It certainly would’ve been easier! If I had taken the simpler route, I wouldn’t have been able to include them in my work and use it as a learning experience. Believe it or not, my 10 and 6 year olds understand quite a lot about my research and the type of degree I’m seeking. They know that mommy dreams of being a university or college professor, or of opening her own school one day. Allowing them to see my trials, tribulations, and successes will hopefully serve as a positive example for them.
over, shaving potatoes sobbing by the kitchen sink.
Serious and purposeful
For those who want Miles Davis' Prestige recordings in close to original form, this is the set to purchase. With the 8 CD set from Prestige hard to find and expensive, this is a good option. You won't get all the Davis/Prestige recordings, and the informative booklet, but what you do get is the chance to experience the music as Davis originally intended us to hear it. There are some extra tracks appended to a few of the discs which don't get in the way of hearing the music as originally released. While its nice (for the most part) to have all his recordings in one set, there's something to be said for hearing these albums as they were originally released.
Well… the main reason is because Bleaunotes pulls in searches everything from musical groups to the Bluenotes clothing store and a kajillion other pages in between. It appears to be a commonly employed name by many other people or companies.
‘Or shall we accept that research is showing that some peoples brains are wired differently and respond to stimuli differently.’
But E@L tells them about Josie Bones instead, beer place in Collingwood, you know the guy from Masterchef, with the hat? Beer and great food. All the wine bars in Singapore, you take them like that That's what they need, E@L, is ranting now, is Good. Fucking. Food. The wine, get some great stuff, but a real chef, you know. There's the guy from Iggy's. Iggy.
I've had a much needed afternoon of crafting today. I designed a recipe index card box a while back and will enjoy making it at my Cupcake Class on 12th May. In the meantime I can show you my Domestic Goddess version:
Me and DH love to eat this rice with little sip of pani puri's pani.
I am honored to note that I am the featured poster on Trufflehead.com this week with my observations about a terrific recipe for Escarole with Garlic and Hot Pepper. Trufflehead is an Iphone and Ipad app that was started by Deborah Chud, a medical doctor and excellent cook, who is on a mission to get us all to cook healthier, delicious meals. You can download a free e-book with five Trufflehead recipes to explore yourself at the site. It was with pleasure that I test drove her escarole recipe (and another for a wonderful citrus-infused Sesame Slaw), because we love escarole in our house.
So now it's time to say what a gorgeous array of entries we had for Kristy's sketch. And great to see 2 fabulous email entries too. You don't have to have a blog to play at MDUC!
Each one is 6×6.
Japan's many dialects originate in a migration of farmers from the Korean Peninsula some 2,200 years ago, a groundbreaking study borrowing the tools of evolutionary genetics reported Wednesday.
The undated article below by Tariq Ramadan calls for a moratorium on stoning and other corporal punishments within Islam. The piece is not new; it has been a permanent post on Mr. Ramadan’s website since at least 2005.
Swim Shorts. If you don’t own a bright-colored swimsuit this summer, you might as well not even go to the beach. I recently fell in love with this swimsuit line called Onia. You can get the trunks in three lengths, depending on how comfortable you are with your legs or how appropriate they are for whatever beach you are on. What fits in on the beaches of Far Rockaway may not be just right for, say, Fire Island. Bonus: if you have a son, they come in matching kids’ sizes. I am getting one for my godson and stealing him away for the weekend, to give Mom and Dad a “break” while I complete my evil plan to become the world’s coolest uncle.
Overall I think this is a terrific novel, gripping and thought provoking; but I'm slightly uncertain about the character of Isabel. She is clearly meant to be attractive; she's certainly loved. And yet somehow there's a lack of warmth about her. However, this may be partly because the story is told in the first person; if you're writing about yourself, it's difficult to convey how others see you. Or perhaps it's intentional; perhaps the point is that Isabel isn't a heroine in the ordinary sense. There was nothing in anyone's character that made them survive or fail to survive the plague; it was just luck. Isabel is an ordinary girl dealing as best she can with an unbearable situation.
I could kick myself for not taking a full "before" picture of the night stands when I purchased them. I saw them on KSL and was instantly in love with their legs, hardware, size, and amazing carved details. They came out of an upscale SLC hotel when they were renovating the rooms. I walked away with them for a mere $40 a pop. Talk about a deal. If you don't know the brand Henredon, go check out their website and then let me know what you think about $40 a piece for these babies. When I picked them up, they looked like they were a cream with some gold-ish glaze. It wasn't till I got home and saw them in the daylight that I realized they were a very yellow cream with an almost greenish glaze. Ick.
She got it for under $10, including shipping.That’s a ridiculously small price to pay for something that can repeatedly make you feel four years old all over again — take you back to when Saturdays were filled with cartoons, cereal boxes had prizes inside, and monsters were confined to books and movies.
So it’s off to the Reservoir we go. I am re-reading, 'That's Another Story' Julie Walters' autobiography. Did you know she once trained as a nurse and did the fastest ever male catheterization recorded at Queen Elizabeth Hospital, Birmingham in 6.5 seconds. The patient would barely have had time to grip the side of the bed. Such a multi talented woman.
to look up the date of a famous battle in a book on war.
Reader kdward contributed this photograph, which he describes as “It’s me, balancing God is not Great in one hand, and my infant daughter in the other.” The picture reminds me of the lyrics of the Stephen Stills song, “We Are Not Helpless,” which go: “The new order is upon us now/It is the children/Who have the wisdom to be free.”
Bella moves to a new town and immediately finds that everyone there wants to be her friend (except for two female characters who are mind-cripplingly obviously jealous) despite the fact that she is not interested in any of them. Bella has no flaws apart from being adorably klutzy. She is convinced that she is plain, and wears no make-up, but everyone reacts to her as if she was ravishingly beautiful. She captures the interest and then the undying love of the main male character despite the fact that he nearly has to turn his whole character inside out to make it happen. She also gets the love of the secondary male character. And all the other boys her age start fighting over her too, even though she's got no interest in any of them either. Bella undergoes no character growth or development within the story because she is already perfect when the story begins. And, as has often been pointed out, the detailed description of Bella is a perfect description of the author, Stephenie Meyer.
Don't read everything I've said so far and assume this novel is a silly little fantasy where crazy things happen. There's nothing silly about it; Bleeding Violet covers some very serious issues. Hanna's mental illness is just written so well. Hanna's off-hand acceptance of the things she knows can't be right - the actual things that aren't "real" - is jaring. It's disturbing to read Hanna's thoughts on things such as suicide, and her actions when some things happen. It's so powerful!
Share with us the different platforms you use to sell your book (bookstores, signing, affiliate programs, website etc.)
The children agreed in our discussion that this would make a good story, but really remarked on nothing but the dead bodies and the guns. I found it interesting that none of them said a word about Liberty herself. While looking at this, Sadie told me about a movie she has at her house in which someone dies, "but only at the end." She thought that this painting must be the end of the story, and for at least some of the figures portrayed here, it was. This may explain why we had so little to say.
Woman must birth to be blessed.
If you fancy your chances at winning a fabulous giveaway put your name down at Victoria Rose Crafts' 100 Follower Giveaway, lots of goodies there!
No other human’s blood can pay for your sin because it doesn’t qualify. Our blood doesn’t qualify because it was plagued with sin passed down from what happened in the Garden. God needed help and wanted to do something because He loves us too much to allow us all to perish. He desperately wanted to save and restore us but He couldn’t until man’s sin was taken out of the way. He won’t fellowship with sin regardless of how much He loves us.
“Most of the $2 bln in synthetic hedge losses have landed up after Q1 results and “any individuals found to be responsible after these positions were discovered will be dealt with”
If you chose your POV well, your writing flows. One expert said, "POV is the glue that holds the story together. It also dictates what kind of description we use and which characters get to do the describing."
In case you were wondering, the starting point for this room, and truly for the other rooms we are updating in this home, is this delightful rug from Company C, the Dandelion Rug.
Sadly, H.B. Gilmour, Randi Reisfield's co-author on the T*Witches and Clueless books, passed away from lung cancer before this book could be completed. Together, they had come up with an idea for a dog detective who speaks. After H.B.'s death, Randi shelved the book for a while until she had a brainstorm: to rewrite it as a tribute to H.B, ditch the doggie detective idea and give Rex a higher purpose.
“You Two Best Come with me… Your Future Needs you” he says.
The poem received mixed reviews from critics, and Coleridge was once told by the publisher that most of the book’s sales were to sailors who thought it was a naval songbook. Coleridge made several modifications to the poem over the years. In the second edition of Lyrical Ballads, published in 1800 (see 1800 in poetry), he replaced many of the archaic words.
I believe it has been said that even after the darkest night morning still comes. I’ve had a night lasting a number of months, I’ve struggled with challenges and disappointments (see previous post) but as I have always know, but I seemed to forget, I am the only one who can manage my diabetes.
Also, I'm happy to announce that JustUs has been accepted to the Rock and Shock Film Festival which takes place October 14-16, 2011, in Boston, MA! The film festival is part of the Rock and Shock horror convention to which I WISH I was going not the least of which because Heather Langenkamp is going to be there! (And Robert Englund...but HEATHER! ;D ) Plus, I bet it's going to be a LOT of fun, but I'd already committed to filming my brother's side project, Didges Christ Superdrum at Zombicon in Ft. Myers that weekend. Plus, JustUs and Sine are playing Canton that weekend...and my friend and JustUs lead actress Sage Hall is getting MARRIED that weekend.
Over the past year or so, I’ve seen (and been sent), a few of his articles and blog posts, but I think I was missing something. All I knew of him was that he was a Catholic writer with a sharp mind, and I didn’t pay him much proactive attention.
How I dreaded Valentine's Day when I was in high school! With my goal of graduating Valedictorian from an all girls' Catholic high school in New Orleans (so that I could perhaps get a scholarship to Tulane University which was my only ticket to college), I was quite the nerd -- studying most of the time with little time to do anything else. So when Valentine's Day rolled around, all of the popular girls in high school would be called to the office at some point during the day, to collect their floral or balloon bouquet that their high school "sweetheart" from a neighboring all boys' high school would have deliver. And I looked at them with envy and sadness to know that I had no such sweetheart and that Valentine's was just another day in the life.
Like you have crossed a red line
Bow was made from ribbon from stash and sentiment again was from red hot bed
Papers: K&Company Floral Dreams, Bazzill
Newly crowned Barclays Premier League champions Manchester City received the highest total payment of £60.6m, the highest broadcast payment any winner has received in the Premier League's history.
I will never totally understand why, but the chorus “God is So Good” kept ringing through my mind. I believe it was God’s presence and the knowledge that God does all things well and would help us to get through this tragedy. After we had taken care of all the necessary things, I fell to pieces and my husband was the strong one.
OG: 1.041
The path crosses a sedge-lined stream in Dawkins Bottom, then climbs beneath tall beeches. I’m impatient to catch a glimpse of the Lymington River, so make a quick diversion east along a bridleway. Passing the warm red tiled roof and wisteria-clad walls of Roydon Manor, dating from the 17th century and now Grade II listed, the bridleway crosses the river by a ford. I linger awhile in this peaceful spot, leaning on the handrail of a footbridge in the shade of ash and alder to watch the peaty water drift by beneath.
With the shortfall of R13bn the estimated gross tax revenue has been reduced to R728.6bn, largely due to a downward revision in net VAT receipts. The VAT receipts have fallen by R13,4bn to R187.5bn, owing to an underestimation of VAT refunds for 2011/12 at the time of budget.
“Nice to meet you,” Riva replied, but her smile didn’t reach her eyes. “And let’s see,” she said, looking down over the list the other woman had written. “Do you also require Kyphi oil?” She looked at me. I had absolutely no clue, so I threw Marlene under the proverbial bus, “Ask her.”
Basically pour out the sugar into a bowl add a tiny amount amount of water you only need about 1 teaspoon for a full cup of sugar and mix really well. If the sugar is too wet it wont work. Add a dot of food colouring and mix in well. Other pastel shades look really pretty too but i only had pink :)
-cane to the back of Jericho.
Greg X. Volz is a vocalist with an incredible range. As front man for the group Petra he helped the group develop a strong fan base and achieve a high degree of popularity. In the few years since he had left Petra he had released two acclaimed albums.
The precise recipe of Cacolac has not changed one iota since 1954 and it is claimed that the secret lies in the choice of its raw ingredients coupled with the way the cocoa and milk are blended, and the sterilisation methods which are applied. What has changed though is the Cacolac production facility itself (pictured above) which, since 2000, has been based in Léognan, 13 kilometres to the south of Bordeaux, a location chosen apparently because it offers easy access to abundant sources of the high-quality groundwater necessary for the Cacolac manufacturing and sterilisation process. The plant now employs a 46-strong workforce and produces 150,000 of the distinctive brown bottles and cans each year.
I know you’re scared of what they could do
“The age-old strangeness of American pop culture gets dissected with hilarious and revelatory precision in these scintillating essays…Sullivan writes an extraordinary prose that’s stuffed with off-beat insight gleaned from rapt, appalled observations and suffused with a hang-dog charm. The result is an arresting take on the American imagination.” —Publishers Weekly (starred)
With twelve minutes left, the Rangers went on their fourth power play of the evening. And for the fourth time, they came up empty.
What was the craziest story or the hardest effort you´ve ever made to get into a club or concert or maybe stadium?
Those of you who own the Miramax box set might want to hold onto it as not all of the extras have been carried over to the Criterion Collection edition. For example, the audio commentaries film scholar Annette Insdorf did for each film have not been included. Also omitted are the selected scene commentaries that actresses Julie Delpy and Irene Jacob did for White and Red respectively. While some of Kieslowski’s student films have been included on this new set, Concert of Wishes, Trolley, and The Office have been omitted. Completists will want to hold onto the Miramax edition.
He was one of the most powerful man I knew…he was an enigma to me…and to the rest of the world. Every day, he proved that…and every day, he told me it wasn’t wrong. It was his…I was his…in the first place…he was my father…
Just as Zeffirelli's Jesus film is underseen by film students, the genius that is Michael York is, for my money, woefully underappreciated as well. Is it just because he's so damned gorgeous and feline and didn't make too many great movies? Well, if you doubt his capacity for wild man fury then you need to see him in Jesus of Nazareth: spittle-flecked rabid as Tybald (in Zeffirelli's Romeo and Juliet); sexily delusional as Logan, and as John the Baptist, well, if you were planning to save any scenery for breakfast, forget it, York makes John the Baptist's holy madness into something far too dangerous for amateurs to come within 100 feet. Jesus comes to him to get baptized like a monk walking into whirring helicopter blades. Witness: Easter Acid Cinema: Jesus of Nazareth!
Got to go I hear the ice cream man coming.......I am thinking mint chocolate chip.
Tomorrow is the first of November.
The kids all have their own designated couch blankets, for movie watching. And even if its the temperature of the inside of an oven in the house, they still think they absolutely need to have them. Nobody can touch anybody elses blanket, by the way, or theres big trouble to be had. See there, how Charlie's foot is touching Evelyn's "gween banky?", well... watch out son, because in about 5 seconds, you're about to vocally attacked by a toddlersaurus who will surely show no mercy.
What about you all? Did you have a good Mother's Day? Did you spend it with your kid(s) or without the kid(s)? Was it relaxing or adventure-filled? Did you get any good gifts? Breakfast in bed? What was your favorite part?
“Mrs. Archer?”
- One Leg Squats – ASSISTED: 5 per leg
For somebody who has seen and done so much his childlike enthusiasm and unerring excitement for the things he loves is reassuring and a testament that time needn't replace passion with nonchalance. Ella's descriptions of him rushing around his studio, pulling rubber ducks, train sets and other notable knick-knacks from cupboards to share with them instead of dedicating his time to spieling about his new fragrance (the real reason for the meeting) really stayed with me. Ever since I've been pondering the feasibility of asking him to be my dad/confidante/uncle/mentor just so that I can be on the receiving end of such a jolly stream of wisdom and damn right coolness.
Eddy is a boy who is growing up in a typical American household. His father works hard to maintain a modest lifestyle for the family and his mother diligently creates a loving environment for her family. When Eddy's father dies, his mother struggles to keep things together. Money is tight, but Eddy still dreams of receiving a new bicycle for Christmas. Instead, he is disappointed to find that his Christmas present from his mother is a sweater that she has spent hours of her spare time knitting for her son. His bitterness becomes an overwhelming force in his world causing him to reject his family. Eddy eventually learns a big lesson about love, sacrifice, and forgiveness that changes his outlook on life.
Contact us
Then she finally started to say Mommy, and what followed was a horrible gasp for air. Her voice was very deep. My husband had already made his way to the room. I did not know if she had worked herself up, because she was in pain, or what was really going on. That gravel, and gasp for air, sounded very similar to my little man, when he gets that cough, yet she had no cough following the gasps. I opened the door for the cold air, and had my husband get her rescue inhaler.
Yet struggle they did.
Just an update from my last post...We had the second ultrasound today and baby #2 is just perfect! Praise God!
As Site Coordinator after two years of documenting changes within our wetlands and Lake Ontario, my outcome leaves me with little Optimism, but mostly first hand knowledge of negative consequences from Pollution from high and low waters. Raw affluence still engorges Cootes Paradise leaving animals coated in an oily substance. The usually white mute swans are a dirty green for two months of the last year 2011. Yet compared to 20 years ago many gains have been made.What happens in Lake Ontario directly affects our wetlands.
A normal person would let the story end there...
There are many ways to 'measure' light output, but wattage and lumens are the most common. The thing is, they don't compare to each other at all. To keep it simple, for defensive uses 5 watts is considered minimum, or 90 lumens. 120 lumens are better, and climb well into the 'Blind your opponent in the dark' range.
I know a few kiddos who are counting down the day until SUMMER! Don’t tell them, but I’m counting down the days also. I’m planning an end of the school year party for my kids and a few friends complete with water balloons, snow cones and cotton candy!
“They slandered us, slung mud at us and shut us out of all the news media – the TV channels of the corrupt elite – and we beat them … The day of national revolution by the Greeks has begun against those who are selling us out and looting the sweat of the Greek people.”
I decided we'd have roast chicken with roast potatoes and vegetables. I buy a raw chicken which is already seasoned and then cook it myself as I find it much juicier than a cooked chicken from the supermarket. I made my own roast potatoes, salt and pepper ones roasted in olive oil and we had broccoli, cauliflower and carrots from a pack out the freezer. The kids had peas!
Professor : You are a Christian, aren’t you, son?
7. WHAT BANDS DO YOU THINK ARE COOL, CURRENTLY?
The menu was more authentic mexican rather than tex mex with some great dishes, although there were some crowd pleasing "Faux Mexican" parts, but I am known to love a Jalapeño popper with the best of them. Athough the first thing I needed after such a long week was a Margarita. I was glad to see that the menu stuck with classic margaritas rather than a host of pre packed silly flavours. The best part was that the tequila was 100% algarve, at this point I was sold. I went for the house, blended and it was beautiful with a really good large slug of tequila. A few of these were sunk throughout the meal.
The seven layers are: graham cracker crust, walnuts, semi-sweet chocolate chips, white chocolate chips, butterscotch chips, condensed milk, and coconut.
As an Inquirer for Ordination in the Presbyterian Church (USA), I am currently seeking Master of Divinity and Master of Theological Studies degrees with a focus in Emerging Ministries.
Anyhoo...I will say that seeing people pass is though heartbreaking, also a very enlightening thing...it's hard not to feel like something bigger or brighter than us is at work.
A. Most of our story ideas come from observing what’s going on around us. What stories aren’t being told, what stories are being told but could use a different perspective? How can we add to the conversation?
On Bowery, sort of where China Town is melting into SOHO, there is a string of lighting stores that carry some nice lines like Circa and Visual Comfort. I bought these Thomas OBrien sconces for a client there and thought about just getting a pair for myself too.
"Yes she will, Seven." I retort, "I think the Borg Queen knows how to enjoy a party a lot more than you do. If you don't like it, loosen up and let Annika enjoy it. This will be her first Enterprise Christmas Party."
Both kitchens had wooden floors and windows over the sink (just like Mom's).
A bit curious (what would Dr. Rosenberg say?), I consulted the National Institutes of Medicine’s great PubMed archive, the National Library of Medicine. At least one widely-cited immunology study mentions lanquin–being tested in mouse pneumonia. More conventionally, it’s used for laryngitis, which I have. Yangyin Qingfei Wan, the nasty chews, are being studied in Asia for preventing lung infection after lung cancer radiation. Its made of figwort root, licorice root, white peony root, dwarf lilyturf root, raw rehmannia root, wild mint herb, moutan bark…etc. Roots & barks. In short, it’s for coughing. Which I’m doing. It’s used here for people with tuberculosis.
And guess what! The story doesn't end here either!
Ok, not a whole lot positive to talk about from last night. The Rangers lost. Ron Washington got ejected on his 60th birthday, and Derek Holland continues to struggle. Sounds like a good time to move along in the 1990 Star Charlotte Rangers team set.
And to tell you the truth, these beds were much better than our beds at home here in Gwalior! And it probably helped to just be outside, sleeping with fresh cold air.
Holy moly, I actually did it. If you haven’t read my previous post, then let me fill you in quick. Or you can also scroll down and just read it. But basically I’m setting out to make some different decisions for my family. This is a NEVER ENDING battle for me and something I think I’m always going to struggle with. FOOD. I’ve struggled with food since I was in high school, really. I mean, really, really, really struggled with it through college. BUT, that’s for another blog post. I don’t struggle with it in those ways anymore, but my health, finding a balance and making good decisions is a constant battle for me.
In the past few years, I’ve learned a little bit more about how to “see” through a camera’s lens, to recapture an element of what I am noticing in a moment. It’s far from perfect, and I’m not a photographer by any stretch, but some of my photos are good enough for me to enjoy later, and that seems enough for me.
I think I finally got into my "sweet spot" on the trails today. I struggle with long runs on trails because I try to run too fast. I have to remember that hopping over fallen trees, water crossings and dealing with some serious elevation gains slows me down. Today I focused on finding a pace where I could just keep going for a while and it felt amazing. Here's the elevation chart for the run:
CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION (CDC). Prevention and control of influenza: recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP). MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 2001; 50 (RR-8): 1-36.
The Daily Mail ran a story on the rise in the numbers admitted into hospital due to the demon drink and so naturally went to taxpayer funded quango head Don for a statement.
February: After having been worn down for the latter part of January, I am starting at less than zero. Chemo is kicking my ass. Every weekend I am in bed watching Housewives of Somewhere or Other and I wanna be an American Idiot I mean Idol. It's the search part of the show so you know what I mean about the idiots. These pastimes do nothing to elevate my mood but my waistline is ballooning. My vista springs from an almost constant supine position. My daily apparel changes are from one set of pajamas to another and, yes, clean underwear. Thankfully, I don't give up on general hygiene. Bathing and brushing my teeth continue, I even floss. Shaving my legs isn't exactly a priority but the hair doesn't grow with any urgency and let's face it, there's no need. Our sick-inflicted celibacy continues. How long can we go on like this?
In the second example the suggestion is mentally presented. They, the boss’s mates are making life hard for her. So they mentally suggest “ramming it down my throat” and she would mistake this as her own thoughts. And these people do not have to be very closely related in this case because they are right there relating to her and making life hard for her. If they are regular clients and she worked there for a long time, she would know them well –the entanglement is stronger. However if they make these suggestions directly to her, while in the office, then they can rely on a more casual relationship.
A blog tour, featuring interviews with winning authors and illustrators, will take place in early February, with participation from a wide range of children's literature, family interest, and Jewish blogs. The blog tour schedule will appear on the Association of Jewish Libraries' blog "People of the Books" at JewishLibraries.org/blog.
Heat oven to 350°F. Grease 8x8 inch square baking pan.
More lies and hype from Don will be reported, as an when someone in the media is stupid enough to give him the time of day.
It became clear to many others that Sheriff Arpaio was apparently a clone. He looked in the men’s bathroom mirror, according to sources, and said, “Who the hell cloned me?”
A hint of brown sugar.
While I didn’t love the narration of the book I did enjoy the story and the idea behind the world that Nalini Singh built. It felt like a mix between Lora Leigh’s Breeds Series and the Matrix.
I got everyone settled, poured out the drinks and passed the nibbles, and then went into the kitchen to start the cooking. I looked at the huge turkey sitting there and it looked back at me. I will tame you bitch I thought to myself, and then began to cook. We had enough to feed a small army and I only had a small oven, so it became a hot game of Jenga trying to figure out ways to fit all of the trays and whatnot into it. I had a momentary panic when I thought that my stuffing balls weren’t cooking, but that passed in time. I’m pretty sure it was me whispering, “ Cook you tiny bastards” at them. I felt like a safecracker as I was hunched over the temperature dial, just teasing another little extra bit of heat and watching for things that might be burning.
“Safe drilling for natural gas has the potential to create thousands of new jobs and millions of dollars in economic investment,” the Senate majority leader, Dean G. Skelos, said in a statement. (See: Cuomo Will Seek to Lift Ban on Hydraulic Fracturing, by Danny Hakim and Nicholas Confessore, June 30, 2011.)
but, we really didn't discuss the tracheal collapse much
Miss Wastlund intervened and did the policemen’s jobs for them, leading Superintendent Ian Wylie to later state: ‘I am grateful to the witness for reporting the incident and bringing to our attention her concerns about a police car nearby. We take allegations such as these very seriously.’
REPORTER: Pre-tits?
Apologies for the last-minute update, but if you're around and looking for people to jam with, head over to Breukelen Coffee House tonight. From the Secondary Sound folks:
This book is Christian apologetics above and beyond. It took me quite some time to finish mostly because I wanted think through each segment thoroughly before continuing. The amount of in-depth information could be overwhelming, but the writing style is accommodating and enjoyable.
And with that I have to start working on my schoolwork and I am not allowed back on WordPress until I am done. (If I post anything else today without first saying that my paper is done, you have my permission – in fact I am asking you all – to comment on that post, yelling at me to get back to work on my paper. I don’t know why but I always get very prolific on my blog when I have other things that desperately need to get done and I am putting my foot down today.)
Wednesday night is the night if you’ve decided you want a full-blown taste of Poland: Polish blintzes, dumplings, vodka flowing and live music. As soon as you step foot inside this restaurant you’re in another world: dark and moody (like a good rye bread) and brimming with the smells of freshly cooked comfort food, you’d be forgiven for thinking you’d just stepped out of a snowy Krakow streetscape and into the bowels of a warm, cozy den where the food is served by your Babushka…
But another one of the impressive things about Earth Online is how much work they put into incorporating machinima into the game as part of the world culture. The game has a HUGE amount of cut scenes built into it, and while some of them are directly connected to questlines and other gameplay, there’s also a ton of them that are just there to help flesh out the game world – basically the idea is that the videos are supposed to be what the in-game citizens of Earth watch for entertainment. You go to various viewing centers in the world, and click them on something to start the movie, and it’ll just run on your screen while your character is “watching” it in-game. Thing is, it’s really pretty amazing that they put as much effort as they did into making these things, seeing as the ones that are there for the world culture really don’t serve much practical gaming purpose, other than maybe drop a clue or two about some of the quests you might go on at some point. But they still put in the time and effort to create them just to add more depth to the world. They must really be raking in the gold on subscription fees if they can afford to pay people to crank these things out, let me tell you.
Everything they eat is in season RIGHT NOW.
As the panel continued to answer questions posed by the audience it was obvious that we all had equally diverse opinions and preferences when it came to the various aspects of choosing, using and enjoying our RVs.
Do you get overly emotional in situations? Do you overreact? Are you impulsive when something does not go your way? Do you constantly feel drained by drama?
I remember the softball games between 2000AD and Marvel UK in Regents Park. They were great fun – and so damned competitive. I especially remember the day Brian Bolland joined the 2000AD team then bought me a pint after!
Is this relevant to writing? Yes. The expunging of fun is one of the curses of modern childhood and of education ruled by the National Curriculum. Let wonder and fun thrive. Don't stifle it. Throw beans, wear meringue dresses, shout with joy that you're out of that stifling school, read Asterix and fuck the literacy strategy with its narrow focus on reading for improvement instead of pleasure. Books are fun. Life is fun. If you don't want the fun, at least let the kids have it.
I have two beds and eight pillows. I wish I had enough time to sleep ten hours and then mosey down to the shuttle at a leisurely pace, but I can sleep eight hours and hurry down to the shuttle. That will work.
Keeping tires rotated and replacing when they lose tread is very important to the safety of motorists. Keeping them properly inflated extends their life!
This will of course change 10 more times over the next 10 days, but the fingers are crossed that will we have great weather. And our fingers are crossed that you will, too...
The story is simple, but so philosophically rich and with takeaways that will last a lifetime, e.g., No place is ever the same the second time around, Seasons change but one thing remains constant and that is the love others feel for you and the love you feel for others, Take care of it and it will take care of you, Life is made worth living with love, Your children will be your ultimate legacy and your children’s children your joy; In the end you can only take your memories with you so make them good ones. What adult would not like to read this story to their child over and over again, in hopes that they will learn, together, all the other hidden lessons of this book?
“We have a list of another 43 people who have gone missing. Their chances of survival are almost zero. The three Ukrainians are still missing.”
you would walk with me always.
So, you ready to see the new blog??
I did a total of 7 paired decreases instead of the 4 the pattern calls for (we are after slinky here), and then at the next pattern repeat I started paired increases for the hips. I marked each of the increase rows (which correspond to the cable pattern repeats) with a green removeable stitch marker. This means that I never have to count, or keep track of anything. The sweater just knits itself. Hooray!
If this was an isolated incident, you might say I’m overreacting. But it’s not. As I stated earlier, Tebow has probably taken up 30% of Sportscenter’s air time in the past couple years. In February, it was all Linsanity, all the time. Nobody leeches onto a topic and sucks it dry like Sportscenter these days. It’s embarrassing how obvious their sensationalist journalism has become. For example, yesterday John Harbaugh made a comment on a local Baltimore radio show that cheating isn’t worth it in the NFL because whatever you accomplish will always be looked upon as “stained.” He made a passing reference to Spygate (apx. 14000 Sportscenter hours to date) and had the ESPN world up in arms. Here’s his exact quote:
It has 2.5 miles of golden sand!
No clue!
Reality beneath the mask:
That last one was with no cropping at all, that’s how close the goose was to me at that time, I did get one more of it even closer, but the auto-focus couldn’t keep up with how fast the goose was coming at me, so the photo is out of focus.
Tout jeune, il contemplait, sans gîte et sans valise,
The views were fantastic too although there was a bit of a chilly wind up there! Afterwards we went to see the inner workings of the clock which was fascinating; however if I was a guide there I would find it difficult to remember all the technical details.
You just can't get out. No escape!!
After that I started to look for people who could help me, including my trusted supporters like Ari Diskin. I always know that I’ve started to turn the corner and am on my way back to health when I ask for help. I don’t want anyone to fix me, I know that only I can ‘fix’ myself in these situations, but others can provide powerful reminders, or can offer strategies that I can employ.
So don't go to tastings and ask the wine rep there if they're rated. Taste the wine, close your eyes, let it sit on your tongue while you breathe over it, let all the long-chain molecules waft through your sinus passages and over your palate, and either swallow or spit, your choice. But make your own decision.
It was May 9, 1945, the day after World War II ended in Europe. Goering, Foster and a group of officers from the Army’s 36th Infantry Division gathered on a tiny airstrip outside Kitzbuhel, Austria, to transport the highly-prized war prisoner back to Germany in an unarmed, two-man reconnaissance plane.
I like putting long earrings on one side only. Inspired by Silver from 90210. But this trend matches some get ups only.
I feel free to be myself. I feel good about myself. I feel open and sexy and safe.
5. Everything is so cheap here (at least if I compared to Jakarta), especially the alcoholic drinks.
So here I am today to give you guys a lil short update on my short trip to Taiwan for the 2nd time in September 2011! I went for my first trip ever to Taiwan around February 2011 and I did a haul video and blogpost HERE.
I bade them farewell, finished my pint, before crossing the road and popping into Tunbridge Well's newly re-opened Morrisons to pick up a sandwich, plus a selection of bottled beers for drinking at home later in the week It was then a short hop back to the station and the train home. All in all it's been a most enjoyable two days back on the local pub scene.
This Spiritual unveiling is illustrated in Romans 8:26 as it flows over into our prayer life. “Likewise the Spirit also helpeth our infirmities: for we know not what we should pray for as we ought: but the Spirit itself maketh intercession for us with groanings which cannot be uttered.”
^ This one isn't really dark-themed, but I figured I would include it today anyway. I made it this morning from a first communion photo from the early 1900's. Hopefully someone will be able to get some use out of it :)
Rom 8:37 Nay, in all these things we are more than conquerors through him that loved us.
I hope and pray I can write something that doesn't waste your time or brain power...LOL...
I made this flower for a card I am working on for Sugar Creek Hollow's challenge on Saturday. The beauty of this flower is that it doesn't have to be perfect and you don't have to spend lots of money to make this. You can use any synthetic material or old curtains you may have hidden in the basement.
Accessories: Oval and Oval scallop Spellbinders and sewing machine.
Meanwhile, the ravens and crows remain a constant presence, along with of course the occasional starling or house sparrow (not to mention the neighbor’s chickens). I am beginning to suspect the ravens in the mysterious case of vegetable row markers pulled out of the ground and scattered about the field.
After the bread, Liz mixed up some apple cupcakes made with Yards Brawler. If you look at the picture above you can see the apples that she added to them. They were cooked in the beer for about 45 minutes, basically creating a not quite apple sauce and infusing the apples with a Brawler reduction. I think this picture is from when she was making those cupcakes. It's Liz pouring some vanilla in the mixer.
Throughout the Mass Effect series, the Reapers have been portrayed as beings beyond our comprehension, not unlike the Cthulhu mythos and H.P. Lovecraft’s cosmicism philosophy.
LP, " Thank you Ann (from Zoolatry on our sidebar) for the graphics. If you would like Ann to do some graphic work for you she charges a small fee for wonderful work :) "
It converts in to memories.
During Easter Sunday I asked you if we could have a little pow-wow. You humbly granted my request. While we were talking I shared somethings with you. At least one of those things has since changed.
Um, twice, Paul? I thought Oregon only has one loss this season.
Movement? Lots of movement...I feel him everyday which is awesome. The best part of last week was that Matt got to feel him move a few times too! It was so sweet :)
The rest of the day dragged on. I don’t hate my job, but my heart just isn’t into it. I have a plan- in Soon I will start classes to get my certificate as a Nutritional Therapy Practitioner. I am so excited! I finally came to realize that this is what I wanted to do sometime last year. I was really struggling trying to figure out what I wanted to do with my life. I have a masters in nonprofit leadership, and I work for a nonprofit right now doing fundraising. While I wouldn’t change a thing about my journey to get where I am, I realized that I just wasn’t fulfilled. And I didn’t really have a desire to take the next step up in the fundraising world. Reading about nutrition, food policy, cooking, and the like was and still is something I spend a majority of my free time doing. In fact (and I am admitting full on nerdom saying this), 90% of the books I have read in the last 3 years have been about food in some way.
Hmm… lets see know… what shall I focus on ?
Now that the cocktail culture in Austin is in full swing, it shouldn't come as a surprise that cocktail pairing dinners are on the rise. Here's two that are coming up in the next few days. I've only done one cocktail dinner so far, and needless to say, it was an absolute blast.
Katla’s magma chamber is 10 times the size of Eyjafjallajokull, which grounded planes because of the ash that covered large parts of Europe.
Forest of Feelings, Care-a-Lot, and Earth
I didn't want to wait until the last minute to get my project done.
Okay, back to regular blog post.
-the camera that I use
Blutterbunged – Confounded, overcome by surprise
Both Griffin men had misgivings about Iraq and whether it was the right place to battle radical Islam.
Wrap:
We're all human. We all have our blind spots, pet peeves, and personal crusades. We can be right about one thing, but absolutely wrong about another. From the top of the publishing food chain to the bottom, you will find people who know what they are talking about most of the time but not all of the time.
It takes courage to pursue justice. You have to stare evil in the face and demand accountability. It is easier to let evil have its day. So, if we cling only to mercy, then there is nothing to stop the advance of true evil. We live in a constant state of spiritual warfare. And God is a God of justice. We should be irate at injustice in the world and willing to risk our own lives to stop it.
So then I had a year to fill, before further education. And not for me, the resources so often taken for granted now, to go travelling around the world, no gap year for me, a work year was predicated.
Answers at the bottom of this post.
Will be round to visit you later - have a fab day!
I got the idea while driving by this place in Westborough that sells things like this and ordered it out of a catalog. It is a birthday gift for you and Steve. Mom thinks it is smiling and being happy and I think it is crying and being sad.
It was also suggested that men may be psychologically affected due to the difficulty in the development of the foetus with the XY chromosomes into a normal boy. According to them, man is an altered state of woman and thus has the tendency to remain a woman as can be seen in the high number of male-to-female transsexuals as opposed to the female-to-male transsexuals. Man is more androgynous that woman and this may explain why transvestism and institutionalisation were often accorded only to men historically.
I also love how deeper issues, such as her mom's drowning, were mixed in to balance out the fluff. Everything worked out nicely, making this a perfect quick reader.
He tossed her the bag and she left. One of the shorter men slapped her butt. She was about to object but walked off. Andrew stared at her and mirrored the same shock I felt. I wanted to save her, she didn’t deserve this. She was too innocent. But I didn’t come here for that, hopefully she’ll be free after I’m done.
Soon I'll get there.
Go with the David Robinson strategy. Bring in LSU’s DE Sam Montgomery, or USC’s WR Robert Woods, or go safe with Alabama OT D.J. Fluker. Bring back Jon Vilma and Sean Payton and suddenly the Saints are ready to win the 2014 Super Bowl.
Wow, is this a can of worms? So, other than the obvious physical differences, what makes us so different? Oddly, the same hormones which create and maintain the physical differences, also create and maintain the mental/emotional/psychological differences. Yep, for women, its the estrogen and progesterone which give us round hips, small waists, breasts, soft voices, and very little body hair. While at the same time giving us the desire and drive to be nurturing, romantic, passionate and loving towards others.
affordable and quality
I would love, love, love to hear about anyone’s progress! Post it (or a link) on my FB page www.facebook.com/ShimmerlingsFanPage Share it with the Class, as my english teacher used to always say when I got in trouble for whispering in class!! HAVE FUN AND SHARE IT WITH THE CLASS!!!
Thage would kill me if I didn’t mention the Tsididi Ice Sculpture and the cake which is made of Philadelphia cheese icing and the chocolate sponge, layered with caramel, sandwiched chocolate brownie and covered with chocolate butter cream icing. I think that’s a mouthful about the cake and I only have three words for that Sculpture, Beauty, Creativity, and a definite Masterpiece. I’m still wondering how such a thing was done though, maybe I should consider visiting the Tsididi headquarters soon enough.
Founded in 1865 by Georges Favre-Jacot in the Swiss Jura Mountains. The name Zenith comes from he word that designates the highest point in the universe, ZENITH. With rapid success, the company already had over one thousand employees by 1875, producing pocket watches, pendulum clocks and counter instruments for the Navy.
Yes, this statement will get some laughs. Why should we support a company just because it is from our native land? Why shouldn’t we try to knock it down even further when it delays new features? Well, the Canadian Pension Plan (CPP) owns approximately two million shares of RIM, which effectively means that every single Canadian citizen has a stake in the company. In essence, if RIM fails, we (Canadians) all lose something. Whether it means our CPP would be reduced is a bit of a stretch, but more realistically, it would lead to other cost-cutting measures so that the government could recoup the loses felt by a possible RIM fail.
silver-tongued I coax and compliment her into my bed,
Mistakenly engaging in substandard intercourse with an unclean but affable tramp, being gang raped and murdered by an unruly throng of bums and lowlifes, and having your lifeless corpse violated by a morbidly obese junkyard foreman are surprisingly not the worst things that can happen to you in the soiled universe that is Street Trash, J. Michael Muro's mucilaginous masterpiece about life on the fringes of a wet society. I'm afraid not. Get this, you could end up expelling slimy ooze from a wide variety orifices. And while the act of ejecting goo may sound like the perfect conclusion to a most stressful day, the gunk coming out of you in this film is not something you want see trickling and spurting its way out of a smallish, helmet-covered hole. Thick, green, yellow, purple and blue, and erupting from places you wouldn't moisture to seep, the stuff basically cooks your internal organs, boils your blood, and causes your skin to liquify. What I'm trying to say is that while being gang raped and murdered does have its drawbacks, the results that occur after taking a swig from a mysterious brand of hooch are, to put it mildly, quite messy.
Next stop Tin Hau temple. Said to be built over 600 years ago, it still stands in glory. The temple is dedicated to A-Mah (aka Tin Hau) and sits on the bay of A-Mah which in Chinese is "A-Mah Gau". According to legend, when the first Portuguese arrived the first thing they saw as the temple. The locals told them they're at "A-Mah Gau"...and eventually "A-Mau Gau" became "Macau".
One tough little plant that I may have underestimated in my garden is the strawberry begonia. It's also known as a strawberry geranium, but is neither a begonia nor a geranium. This little guy loves to creep around my garden and sends out little babies in every direction. It puts out delicate little flowers in the springtime.
I am trying hard to wrap my brain around all of this. Especially in light of the first two things I read this morning. First being the verse delivered to my email inbox.
As I stood there watching, the surroundings grew the hue of tangelo. I had to walk out, camera in my hand, witnessing a natural wonder, while the beauty of the first visible mid winter sunset unfolded through the barren trees in our backyard. The amber coloured skies created a sense of preview of what is to come, as winter moves into the second half of its reign.
I worked extremely hard in mastering these tracks up to as much snuff as I could humanly do with the tools in my arsenal. Where there was a previous reference point available for EQ, I matched up B to A as best I could (in that "The Queen Is Dead" now sounds identical - in EQ, that is - to the official less-lengthy version, for example). Where there wasn't, I used similar sounding tracks from (ideally) the same recording session. And when I couldn't do that, I trusted my ears. But every track needed a fair touch of massaging, not Steve's fault but rather due to the nature of the source itself.
available to a low to moderate-income person by each approved business. Please provide
For years I saved a bar of Pears soap sent to me by my mother one Christmas. She sent a few bars but I used the others, saving this last one for a special time. September 2011 blasted my brain, eroding trust in all relationships in my life from friends to family to people I had known since I was 19 years old. My skin reacted, as it did once when I was with a sister when the skin of bare forearms touched a shopping cart, if I remember correctly. I immediately broke out in hives and my sister couldn’t believe the reaction spreading up my arms from the wrist area. “I wouldn’t have believed it if I hadn’t seen it myself,” she said.
Refrigerate until you wish to serve, probably best within a couple of days. Before serving, dust the top with a layer of cocoa with a sifter to finish.
When we get home, I let Dash choose all the other ingredients for the Batman Salad. Thanks to Berkeley's October summer, our tiny porch is exploding with cherry tomatoes, basil, parsley, thyme, mint, and lemons. Dash picks, stems, snips, and then piles everything up on the counter.
Refinish the Wood Floors
I have this theory about boredom. I think it is the cause of a great deal of mischief in people’s lives and even may underlie why nations go to war. Even the current turmoil throughout the Maghreb and the Middle East may have an element of boredom as people grow tired of their current despots and seek to overthrow them.
morning to have
Can it get more helathier than this :) :)...
This story is in Japan and main person is photographer. Name Ken Harada. He wants to earn so much money by famous and nice picture he takes.
It happens a lot in Park Slope. I used to complain but then I realized that is the price I pay for living in an interesting place. Nick Carr, who writes a great blog caled Scouting NY said it much better than me in this piece he wrote for the New York Times on March 19, 2010
God should always be first, in everything that we do.
I’m now reading Oogy by Larry Levin. I lost a piece of my heart to him when I saw his sweet little face on the front of the book jacket. When he was a puppy, someone used him for bait in a dog fighting ring. That’s all I’m going to say at this point. I haven’t read enough to say much more. Learning about dog fighting is something we should all do though. It’s just amazing to me that this is happening.
After both she and #1 got home on Saturday,
they did taste divine though
Suggested Pairings
And while you're in the clicking mood, stop over for Eternal Encouragement page for all sorts of encouragement for wives and moms, or sign up for encouragement sent right to you in your email at http://www.eemagazine.com/
To count my blessings.
After booking it back to campus after work, I changed quickly and ran out to the fields, trying to figure out team wearing white shirts was mine. Finally, the captain of the team saw my confused face and pulled me over to introduce me to my team. First thing they all said to me:
It seems you need a degree in promotion and marketing, blog, web site, twitter, pod casts, and many others that appear on a daily basis.
From the truth
Got a pot belly. It's not too big. Gets in my way when I'm driving my rig. Driving this country in a big old rig, things I see mean a lot.
I know some of you are wincing right now. BDSM and sexual internet perversion in a mainstream novel? Yessir. Trust me, even though the topics are a little racy, the story is more than just twisted fiction. I seriously think King of Paine is the most canny and intelligent suspense piece I've ever read. Kahn's literary style is, I cannot stress enough, very impressive, and his organization and consistency of thought (which are the essential elements of a good whodunnit) amazes me. His diction is grandiose, never boring and always intriguing, but he does all this without sounding unprofessional or perverted, in the way that many authors of similar genres do.
Tina walked at the door, expecting it to open and instead rebounded as she slammed into it. She rubbed her nose and swore. “Shit. They're already shutting down nonessentials. I'm just trying to buy some time.”
Cut the bread into largish cubes and put into a large bowl.
-skip ahead 5-6 months later. I was huge and was a walking kangaroo. Don't try to wear yourself out at this stage. Its too late in the game. A walk in the grocery store after a hour or so wore me out!!!! Literally I would have to take a nap after and If I didn't I was crankkyyy! (btw;I didn't really exercise regularly) So if you do then you shouldn't have a problem but still take it easy on yourself.
91. Suck - 21st Century Schizoid Man (4:51)
Congratulations girls fabulous projects, we would love you to share your success with our Top 3 Badge.
Through living roots awaken in my head.
Like Prick Perry apparently being behind a bill to make the guardasil vaccine mandatory. 49
Rosalita knows that she is ruining her life (again) but she tells the truth. It was a big claw that ripped her open and that the restroom window should not be open so how do you explain that, how is that explained?
A small frypan is used to flame the Wray & Newphew overproof white rum, floated on top of a heady cocktail made with Appleton Extra Jamaican run, Creole schrubb (an orange and rum liquer), orgeat (sweet syrup made from almonds, sguar and orange flower water), lime, roasted pineapple and bitters.
A few weeks ago Samuel woke from his nap not quite himself. He went to nap at 11:30am and woke at 2:30pm with some extra issues.
Pretty much any book that engages a child is a book worth reading. It gets kids into the groove. It must be turning on their brains, or they’d put it down. And if the kids are reading picture books even into their double digit years, well, ’tis better to read than to not read. My 12-year-old reads Peanuts like the bible — it is his joy in life, his comfort, his compass. To yank that away and say, “Time for ‘Crime & Punishment, kid,” would BE a crime and a punishment.
Katherine’s favourites are
Or like the snowfall in the river,
I’ve come to terms with all that I’ve lost,
What does it suggest?
Michael Leander, founder of MarkEdu is such a witty commentator on what's really happening online that I've had him speak every year.
In a large bowl, toss the sweet potatoes with the oil and the pomegranate molasses. Place in a single layer onto the baking sheet and sprinkle with the salt. Bake for 1 hour until the sweet potatoes are glazed, caramelized, and tender.
This has in turn proved in itself the truth that the BNP has stood by, despite criticism.
(Franklin Institute, Philadelphia)
Fish, Jefferson M. “It’s Bigger than You Might Think: Broadening the Science vs. Religion Debate.” The Humanist July-Aug. 2010: 27+. Academic OneFile. Web. 5 Apr. 2012.
The popularity of dragon tattoos is partly due to the number of fresh and exciting designs now available, but also due to the sharp, projecting elements of the dragon's fangs, wings and claws which modern tattoo artists can now produce successfully, to give clean and striking definition to the tattoo image. When Kwai Chang Caine picked up the red hot dragon bowl in 'Kung Fu' using his forearms, thus imprinting himself with the dragon and tiger brand of the Shaolin Temple, he could not have received a dragon symbol half as sharp and striking as anyone can receive nowadays in a modern tattoo parlor, and without the pain.
What a fabulous sky !
Blood Money is an erotic thriller film produced by Mukesh Bhatt. Kunal Khemu and Amrita Puri are in the pivotal role. Mukesh has given the responsibility of direction to Vishal Mahadkar and the script has been penned by Mahesh Bhatt. Distributed by Vishesh Films and Viacom 18.
Well I guess I shouldn`t be too disappointed as there were the usual block makes for bees including the big HST block for the Care Circle of do.Good Stitches and my starter blocks for the Stitch Tease bee, a notebook cover for Sunni`s Farmer`s Wife in Your Life series, some scrappy grannies, a couple of pouches and the interviews for the My Modern Muse series.
Addressing decreased lymphatic drainage and a depressed immune system with a chiropractic adjustment can help the body heal the ear infection. Pediatric patients with ear infections receive a very gentle but precise adjustment along with some light lymphatic massage. Some chiropractors also give nutritional recommendations, like eliminating dairy to help decrease mucous. The International Chiropractic Pediatric Association has a listing of chiropractors that work with children on their website atwww.icpa4kids.org.
So, in no particular order, here's 20 movies to get excited for over the coming months:
She confidently and authoritatively walks in the room where you are waiting—you can barely maintain your composure from the sexiness of her black leather spiked high-heel boots and hot black leather mini dress. You are taken aback, but smile sheepishly when you take her all in with your lust-filled eyes.
All of the other candidates had further campaigning work to do that evening, and were shortly enough on their way to do it. I stopped in at the Mosque Kitchen on my way home for a Southside curry and rice.
--Once Delver's lighting arm device and Osyl's use of the subterranean repilmalian lightning crystal were brought to bear, the bugs started to die in satisfyingly explosive ways --save a warrior that managed to disappear elsewhere on the bridge levels.
THE SHOT – winner of the Jessops “The Shot” competition.
Wow - 5 blog posts in July and 2 in a week - thanks to WIP Wednesdays (and FO Fridays) my blogging's back on track! Yay!
-Gray’s Anatomy (I’d rather gouge my own eyes out)
Autumn is upon us, and what better time of year for hiking is there? This weekend was an opportunity to get out and enjoy fall and take care of some trails in the extreme western end of the park for me. I've been up the first part of Cooper Road trail (out of Abrams Creek Campground / Ranger Station) MANY times, but had never done the Gold Mine or Cane Creek trails, both of which dead-end at the park boundary. This means they are by necessity up-and-back sorts of trails. I had originally intended to make a bit of a loop at the end of the hike by taking Hatcher Mountain trail, but it remains closed due to the tornado that went through the park last May.
Tony Blair and his excuses.... hmmm.
Johnson told McBride, "You drove extremely dangerously and recklessly, with total contempt for other road users.
high above
After a long work day on Wednesday, I ended my day in Boulder to set myself up for the next morning. Even though I got into my hotel late, I was still able to check out Avery Brewing's tap room for a few samples. The Maharajah IIPA and the Hog Heaven Barleywine were the real highlights of the place, but the most enjoyable part of the evening was the conversation with Peter, Avery's Sales/Marketing/Events Coordinator and self-titled Beverage Facilitator who knew way to much about his product, for that matter, beer in general. He was a great host and it made for a fantastic start to the evening. I then headed down to Mountain Sun Brewpub on Pearl St. for a couple pints (their Colorado Kind Red Ale was passable, but the FYIPA was pretty much a spot on American Style Pale Ale) before heading to the local Old Chicago for some pizza and a pint.
And what did I learn, personally?
As you will know these steps, and the exhausting of the negotiating procedures, left the NUJ with no alternative but to ballot their members at the group for industrial action. Consequently NUJ members at the Group took industrial action for two weeks between April 18 and April 29 2011. We are informed that the NUJ is conducting a fresh ballot on industrial action and that the previous strike was well supported by the local community.
However, today is the day to remember those who sacrificed their lives to make and keep Israel a vibrant part of the world. A good place to start if you want to know more about why Israelis treat today as such an important one, is the site dedicated to the life of Alex Singer: www.alexsinger.org.
This evening I'm attending a very small birthday dinner with a couple of friends. I really never know what to gift these days. Everyone seems to have everything! I've given many handmade goodies over the years, but not always sure that's the best choice. So..... In this case I bought a couple of little gifties, a cute bookmark and folk art blank book. But, never happy unless I prim things up a bit. I wrapped the gifties in some scrap linen and tied with this pretty aqua blue ribbon. The ribbon had been a tad too baby blue, so I coffee dyed it. Then I topped the package with a little fabric flower brooch I made.
In my own defense, his maternal cousin spends Saturday nights in a McDonald’s play zone. His wife is bi-polar. Jealousy is the glue that holds them together but they’re sparring for a take home prize no one in their right mind would want to win.
It’s as if we want out children to grow up fast by forcing adult themed entertainment on them as soon as possible.
Budget Travel
Cut the log into thirds. From each third, cut further into thirds. Flatten with your hand each piece of dough to seal the open edges and keep the filling in place. The book suggests using dental floss for cutting the dough, but I find table knife works well if you’re not particular about losing some filling — nylon string would work better than dental floss.
Hailing from Indianapolis/Bloomington, and warming my heart to see a few dudes that I haven’t spoken with in a very long time, this is one of the best examples (along with Racebannon, Gates of Slumber, and the aforementioned Black Arrows…)of what kind of shit goes down in the Indiana basements, much to others’ surprise. Quality rage, pure violence, and a taste for the macabre is welcome in any metal scene, I am aware, but it is this Hoosier scene that I so miss. There may not be quanity, but so help me…you know where that thought is going.
As soon as you are able, we shall go North. If there is a place where you have relatives, we can go there. If not, we can go to T’o Tlakai, or some place where your clan is strong, or wherever you wish. We shall get the sheep that my mother is keeping for me, and we shall buy others, and we shall live among The People. That is the only way, I think.
I first learned of the existence of Mighty Coala when Janet made an artist overview for the band. Always one to enjoy some sweet pop I've been waiting for a release since, and a couple of weeks ago I learned that Mighty Coala has a full length album coming out. Seizing the opportunity I approached the band to see if I could learn some more about them and Seungsu swiftly returned with answers to my questions:
Spock’s Beard- Snow
I "officially" left school about half way through 9th grade, but mentally I had begun checking out a few years before.
These are some of the books, articles and podcasts that I use in my courses -
After being a bit worried about finding not one but 2 graduation dresses that I would also be able to wear to other events, I am SO SO SO happy mama and I found everything today (and got some awesome sales). Can it please be graduabirthday already so I can rock these pretty dresses?
"Are you sure you should be in today?" Ted asks me..
I do have a night out Friday and Saturday - Saturday is a buffet but I'm going to eat before we go so I know I'll be okay there. Friday is a quiz night with fish and chips for tea. I will make sure my calorie count can allow for this during the week and the day itself.
HHH countered with the fact that he has gotten some right, and some wrong. One guy who has mastered becoming a star, when he had nothing was John Cena, now he is the biggest star in Wrestling.
Keeping in mind that this is an arid dry climate when re-designing your landscaped and creating your watering system will increase growth, decrease plant fungus and disease, and allow for endurance during the hot summer months.
There are many, many more features out there. A ring built in that can allow the flashlight to be grasped like a syringe, that can be a good thing. Likewise good, some part of the light body shaped something other than round... allowing the flashlight to be laid down without it rolling away. Space for a lanyard to attach can come in handy, and the ability to focus the light beam might be useful too.
(Update: this is still a valid method for your website, but Blogger has now added the ability to your Page Elements page. At the top left corner of the Page Elements layout, click the edit button on the Favicon element, and upload your image...Viola! If you are using a customized template that doesn't have Page Elements, you may still need this method for your blog!)
Find items that can grow with the kids. Cassie skipped the cartoon-y themes her daughter first asked for, and instead went with a subtle Parisian theme.
Nonetheless, Justice Department officials allegedly later told Al Rajhi executives that if they did not comply with the subpoena, the agency would consider options under the Patriot Act “that could adversely affect the bank.” Those included asking the Treasury Department to designate the bank as a money laundering concern, and terminating its “correspondent accounts,” which allow foreign banks to make transactions in the United States.
I didn't realize there was a target amount of money we were hoping to raise in order to accomplish all four of the initiatives, but apparently that goal was $30,000,000. God said "I see your 30 million and I raise you 16 million." FREAKING INSANE!!! Ah, what a crazy journey the next 3 years will be.
count. The beach above us,
They came home a couple of times, they missed us! Apparently they like it there now - we haven't seen them in a couple of days.....
If you've already done so, you're completely and 100% eligible to click the little option below and get the +5 points.
- Aluminum foil 25′ – 50′ 2 for $6.00 (Alcan)
"Yes, after we both die, you guys can have all of our money. But it might be a long time you know."
“When someone picks on you directly, you cower and shy away. Don’t make sense to me. You’ll take a beat down for someone else but you won’t so much as a cuss in your own defense.”
Script Frenzy is over and I got hardly much of my actual script written for the upcoming “Orcs for Hire” web comic. Bad thing? Not necessarily. I’ve tried writing scripts before and it’s not my thing.
Ron has competition on 'Let The Monkey Drive', as an animated version of the monkey from the albums cover takes to the keyboard on-screen! 'I've Never Been High' is as beautiful and moving as ever, and really shows just how incredible Russell's voice is sounding. '(She Got Me) Pregnant' is another slice of wonderful Mael madness!! The 'pregnant' dancers are a master-stroke, as they huff and puff their way through the routine, whilst holding on to their 'bumps'! Very funny, very enjoyable, VERY Sparks!
Mr Wilkinson who called Mr Griffin an "out and out racist" on air after Nick Griffin said he supported the Gurkhas wholeheartedly, showed his shocking lack of knowledge of UK politics by addressing Mr Griffin as Mr Griffiths!
Every so often, i try to think of something different to prepare. on weekdays when D and i rush to get to work on time, the usual breakfast is a packed sandwich, either PB&J, ham, cheese, tuna, marmalade, whatever. so on weekends, when we have more time, we have an occasional pancake breakfast, or ma-chang, or rice with longganisa.
mini
Set a heatproof bowl over a saucepan of simmering water. Put the butter in the bowl, top with the chopped chocolate and stir occasionally until the ingredients are just melted - you don't want them to get so hot that the butter separates. Remove the bowl from the pan of water.
Did Jesus really say that?!!
As the place of supply is the home country of the customer the VAT is charged at the rate of that country.
● BAILOUTS = GOVERNMENT EXPANSION
1940's black velvet handbag-thrifted
99. V. Ovid, Metamorphoses, vi, Philomela.
The butterfly garden needs 2 more plants and it is done. I just haven't been able to find the plants yet.
Some great other links for articles on post-marathon recovery are:
The night progressed from there. There was singing and there was laughing and, oh boy, was there drinking. They were having a riotous good time and were incredibly gracious to let us all crash their party. It was all good fun. The groom joined us at our table and we held conversation. Not much of it made sense, but it was fun. The groom's brother, Killian explained that he was the best man and the best man gets to choose the groom's attire at his stag party. Killian just chose a cute little green number and he enjoyed every bit of his genius. The rest is history. Much shall remain our little secret. Wouldn't want to cause a stir for anyone. I've already said too much.
B. a possible split in the Whig and Democratic parties over slavery.
"The prevalence of all autism spectrum disorders combined was 6.7 cases per 1000 children."Prevalence of 6.7 per 1000 comes out to 1 in 149--or about 1 in 150, the prevalence figure Autism Speaks widely promotes. Applying a prevalence of 1 in 150 across the 2000 US census figure of 280 million equals 1.87 million autistics. Following Autism Speaks' apparent policy of rounding to the nearest half million, that would be 2 million autistics in the US.
Young's Double Chocolate Stout (44 Stone has in cans)
Pretty simple. What are your fitness and health habits?
When Jesus spoke before crowds of people, He spoke in parables. People were compared to tangible things that were commonly known among men. In this portion of passage, people were being compared to soil and its ability to yield crops. Whoever not only hears the word of God, but receives it, will be like good soil – ready to cultivate and grow abundance – understanding and able to share the goodness of God, so that many may come to know Him.
The Hebrew Scriptures are very clear that promises are to be carried out. Jesus reiterated that principle and took it a step farther. He basically said, don't make promises you can't keep. Let your yes be yes and your no be no (based on Matthew 5:34-37).
In the meantime, heat the oven to 400F and pop a handful, or two of walnuts into a roasting pan. Toast them in the heated oven until you start to smell their nutty aroma, but before they become too deeply browned. Remove the pan from the oven (using gloves of course) and throw in some seedless grapes (I like the green/blush ones), and small whole mushrooms. I favour a mix of shiitake, tree oysters and maitake (which I tear into smaller pieces). Sprinkle with a scant teaspoon of smoked Spanish paprika and a couple of bold pinches of Maldon salt before dousing in a decent glug of olive oil. Using a spatula, fold all the ingredients together until everything is evenly coated and well mixed. Pop back into the oven to roast, for 20 about minutes, stirring once half way through.
Vindication syndication
This is exactly what the Bible says:
Now…I just have a few more hours to wait.
Juicer (although a fork would also work)
Tina Martin is a fiction novelist and poet. She holds an Associates Degree in Computer Technology and a certification in Accounting and is currently working as a project administrator.
This fabulous and creative gift can be made for under $5. Hard to believe something this pretty can be so inexpensive.
Sand in between my toes
I added a layer of ribbons, including a length of voile, ivory twill (from my own stash) and a strip of sequin trim. I die cut a label and used one of the stickers from the Crate Paper Pretty Party Phase Sticker sheet. I even re-used the red spotty washi tape the decorative pins are wrapped in from the kit!
12. Ed Talk
Wiz Khalifa – Guilty Conscience
this the family of the little boy? Two days after this
Thus, the equations work out as E=M*V^2/450400 for the American system and E=MV^2/2000 for the metric system.
The problem is that he isn’t really a nerd (Pegg has said he prefers the term ‘geek’), judging by the ability he seems to have had from an early age to get up and perform in front of people. He just likes ‘Star Wars’ and horror films and geeky things like that. Although perhaps it isn’t so much of a contradiction, as I seem to remember that Pegg has argued before against the double standard of someone who loves football being dubbed a fan, but someone who likes science-fiction being dubbed a geek.
Found Father Dan…..
SOUL SURFER (2011)
updated 11/28/11
In Los Angeles, at least a half a dozen rallies were planned. A rally was also planned in Minneapolis.
Joey is trained by the army to be a cavalry mount, and doesn't like it one bit. "Gone was the gentle snaffle bit that I was so used to," he complains, "and in its place was an uncomfortable, cumbersome barbed bit that pinched the corners of my mouth and infuriated me beyond belief."
and know
ሳር ቤቴን መርጌ
And here's a better look at some of those stacked beams.
Well, that's all I have. I am going to a flea market on Sunday(yes I have the hubby's approval to be absent the beginning of Father's Day..especially if it means I might actually contribute something to the bills) & hope I have some luck selling some of these. I also have some other "things" I'm working on. I started out on this web of blogs initially interested in gardens & such. WELL..HA...have you seen any of these DIY blogs??? How about the "Upcycling"????? I am in awe of these people and quite addicted to them now. I now find myself stalking garage sales, flea markets, and, yes, I will admit, people's garbage, looking for something I can give a new life to. I have several things I have done or in "process". Couple of weeks ago I scored some gorgeous (!!!!) solid wood (not sure what, could be maple or walnut) cabinett doors that were never used & a huge pile of trim in every size, shape & color. YAY ME!!!! 5 of the doors I made in to chalkboards, & the last one which is plain I plan on using it to top a table base I picked up today. UNLESS...I can find a really cool piece of flagstone & figure out how to attach it....HMMMM...
Thanks for dropping in, and please leave a comment to let me know you were here :-)
Embellishments: Misc Flower, Prima flower centers, Kaiser Sparklets and Misc Ribbons
There is no guarantee whatsoever that all 17 governments will agree on an increase in the funds available to the EFSF or to increased powers of intervention. The eurozone leaders are reportedly arguing in tense, behind the scenes negotiations about where the EFSF funds will come from. Some leaders are proposing that they would mainly come from the European Central Bank (ECB). This would be, in effect, another form of ‘quantitative easing’, printing money in order to bail out governments and banks through the EFSF. This is strongly opposed both from within the ECB and by a number of governments, such as Germany and Netherlands, who see it as a road to escalating inflation. Regarding the €109 billion loans package, the government of Finland is demanding collateral (security) for its share of the loan. Other governments, such as Slovakia and Austria, are likely to make similar demands. These governments are demanding that a slice of government revenue or physical assets, such as land or buildings, should be allocated to them as security. This is reminiscent of the demands for reparations made on Germany after the first world war.
I’m curious about how many musicians - Icelanders especially - seem to study for a long time in the classical realm, and then depart completely and throw themselves into the worlds of pop, rock, electronica, folk etc.
05 Sugar Chocolate
Thanks for visiting me today ☺☺
She says, "A hundred dollars."
My Total Minutes: 242,900
Stewards - drive around in tractors (as they do at Portman Road)
The first component of "what we do" is the artistic struggle of (and satisfaction you get from) producing your own work and judging it against your own taste and artistic standards. This part would be the storyboards you draw, the scenes you animate, the backgrounds you paint, etc. The artwork you are personally creating during the making of the film or show.
As well as their narrative bending potential, the way these strike missions will be played really appeals to me. Supposedly, each mission will be a small sandbox, wherein you can choose which objectives to pursue first, which will potentially alter your chances for success. I imagine that carrying out objectives in a logical, stealthy order (these are black ops missions, after all) will decrease your chances of discovery, allowing you to complete more objectives before the shit hits the fan. Additionally, you choose as which unit you play as by zooming out to an RTS style overwatch view of the battlefield, then selecting a new unit to inhabit, be it flesh and blood soldier, or a walking tank. You can even issue orders through the overwatch mode, bringing in even more strategic options.
Ryanair just announced to much fanfare they have reworked their only in-flight entertainment option to a smaller and ‘lighter’ product. Literally shaving centimetres off to making a compact A5 magazine. Whilst this is a smart move, reducing fuel burn and cutting costs, not to mention freeing up more space in the overhead bins for everyone’s luggage. I can’t help but feel ‘Let’s Go With Ryanair’ might be a step in the wrong direction. On a 5 hour flight on a Ryanair plane, leafing through the magazine loads of times can be the only thing that stops you from wanting to shoot your fellow passengers.
Petrus Aged Pale; Belgium, Sour Ale, 7.3% abv
She's been living on the streets again
It is against the family's religion to eat meat from a pig. The mum-of-two in the family, who did not want to be identified, complained to Morrisons about the mis-labelled food.
Except I didn't.
Up and down 1st Saddle. Really great outing. Shin felt even better today. This run was an exact repeat of yesterday except that I snuck in some small bits of running here and there on the uphill and then did 8min of barefootin' around the cemetery on the way home. It's been over a year since I've done any barefoot running and it was pretty glorious to free the toes once again, even if it was on frozen, lumpy, dead grass. I feel like the very specific strengthening that this activity offers is something that has been missing from my shin rehab, but this is the first time that confidence in my shin and (relatively) appropriate weather conditions have coincided since I broke my leg last summer.
at languorous feasts of uninspired tedium
Napoleon Solo, Illya Kuryakin (the girl’s favourite), April Dancer, Maxwell Smart, James West, John Drake and of course Emma Peel.
I am nearing that magical age of forty. Not quite there yet, but it is at the end of the month. Fabled as the middle ages (this assuming that I am living until 80, but with the family genes of women in my family living until the 90s, doesn't quite work for me), I am excited about this decade.
Your colour this month - Red Violet
Your shirt for mine.
It sounds cliché and everyone says it, but there is a truth to the saying “ I have met and made good friends in this craft world”. Well thanks to the virtual craft world I met Su…sharing creations learning a lot from her and her super coloring skills. Our crazy schedules and passion for what we do and believe in built the bases for the friendship. I have learned a whole lot from this gal…and anytime we have a chance to be together we do make it count. We do have fun! You see… she even got room here ready with her name on the door and everything..lol.
The blurry camera effect for ambience. The intense dance moves. The paper airplane at the 1:42 mark for reasons I can’t even understand. The blank stare from the 2:15 to the 2:30 mark. When he ducks out of the camera’s view at the 3:22 mark, stays out of the camera’s view for over 10 seconds, and then pops up and says, “What up, Here we is”. What more is there to life?
...Christ the Redeemer "fully reveals man to himself". If we may use the expression, this is the human dimension of the mystery of the Redemption. In this dimension man finds again the greatness, dignity and value that belong to his humanity. In the mystery of the Redemption man becomes newly "expressed" and, in a way, is newly created. He is newly created! (10.1)
3 pounds of Roma tomatoes, halved and seeded
I knew what I wanted to do with them.
admitted to hitting Ahmed with a hair brush, later saying that it was
And it is clear that this is the government’s only idea. In Helen Lewis-Hasteley’s thorough and informative article on intergenerational conflict, she talks of ’Britain moving to a ‘family welfare’ model, with the younger generations relying on the elder more, as happens in some Mediterranean countries.’ Lewis-Hasteley points out the obvious problem with this model, which is that it will only benefit people from wealthy families. It is a model of internships and inheritances and family connections, what Alastair Campbell calls the ‘Downton Abbeyisation’ of our country.
11:15am: After 5-10 minutes of getting my bearings, I got cranky and demanding and asked loudly when I can “get my IV out already.”
The main point George made is that whatever we decide, we can always change it down the road as we see fit. Whatever happens, I'm grateful for all your insights into the dilemma!
the focus of the conference
This was strange, because it was the kind of juicer where any women present are usually strippers or cleaners. And not good strippers, either. Rather, the kind who appear on a Sunday afternoon, between football matches on the telly. The kind who thwock tired, sloppy pingpong balls from tired, sloppy foofs to three half-filled rows of musty housecoats and greasy glasses, the ennui thicker in the air than the smell of toilet cleaner and microwaved egg baps. That kind of stripper.
Taxachusetts01 lamented taxes and the rising cost of gas, implying that gas taxes are used to fund the courts.
Flavor: The Barest hint of a malty middle in the center of the mouth, with a long, dry finish.
red darling!
Leash! Leash! I LOVE my leash!
How's that menu for our 100th recorded dinner in 2010? I had planned to do the baked omelet, but it takes 40 minutes to bake, which is too long. Not to mention the fact that I was pretty sure William wouldn't eat it. I really need to use up some ham that has been in our freezer for too long, so I made the French toast and chowder instead. For the chowder, I didn't follow a recipe. I think this is the first time I've made something like this completely on my own, with no recipe. I had searched through a bunch of different chowder recipes, but when I got home, I decided to wing it. And it turned out pretty good.* So, William ate the French toast, popcorn (that was his request) and a small amount of fruit. Seth ate the French toast, a few bites of chowder, a lot of his fruit (the grapes anyway), and a few bites of popcorn. Since they got syrup on their French toast, that counted as dessert. William was fine with that.
Giveaway Winners:
Very high self esteem. Will probably call you ugly to your face, then look in the mirror and smile, nodding at his own reflection.
blood
I saw a rather weird film of Pericles being acted out with toys, and a very enjoyable production of A King and No King (which wasn't actually part of the conference, but the student group performing it wisely timed it for this weekend). I remembered only three things about AKANK from grad school: that it was about a king who falls in love with his sister but she turns out not to be his real sister (accurate); that there was a joke about someone confusing "peace" with "peas" (also accurate); and that it wasn't very good (this turned out to be quite wrong -- I mean, I won't say it's a particularly deep play, and it certainly isn't a plausible one, but it is a heck of a fun romp).
With another year of blogging under our belt, I think it is fun to see how we have grown. On this day, one year ago, we had...
Suitably refreshed it took about an hour to get back to the hill from there where we met up with Mike and Nick who’d been enjoying a pint themselves in The Swan in Inkpen. Mike had made it to south of Andover, and Nick, in his second flight made it to Whitchurch under 8/8ths cloud cover.
Posts from me to you...
“Sex And The City is back on TV – but an increasing number of British career women are turning their backs on metropolitan life in favour of the traditional courting rituals of the countryside.”
Now, I’ve realised how much I’ve been overreacting.
Hundreds queued up for butterbeer, while others crowded into the Owl Post. By mid-afternoon, a line of 200 hopefuls stood outside Ollivanders wand shop. And another location to buy souvenir wands was added outside the Owl Post, which has been a bottleneck for shoppers.
Ella wears a size 3 diaper (and will for a while, I'm sure), and wears about size 2 shoe. She now has enough hair to wear a barrette or a small bow without a headband....YIPPEEEE!!
It is crucial that the butter does not melt while the pastry is worked. Therefore, you must work as quickly as possible (particularly if your kitchen is hot) and on as cold surface as possible, I sugest you please dont try to make in hot day. Professional pastry chefs use a refrigerated marble. You need not to go that far. Since you want an evenly layered pastry, it is important that you always roll it to the same thickness and that the edges be very straight and even (this takes some practice!)
(I have been born of the same as the war was born,
I suspect the answer is very few. It doesn't matter how the law is 'officially worded', it matters how it will be perceived by businesses across the land, who instead of consulting a grand an hour employment lawyer will simply not take the risk. The result will be to force more and more white males out of the work force, which is exactly what Harman and her agenda driven minions want.
The humble sock. It has so many functions. It will keep our foot warm when it’s cold. It will make wearing shoes more comfortable. It will had a spark of color or fun to a blah wardrobe day. The thing about socks – for the majority of us – they are best worn in matched pairs. Lose one and the other will languish in single sock prison.
I did not add an overcoat of polyeurethane or anything that might help keep the paint on. I did drop water on it, stepped on it with shoes, bare feet, and socks to see what might happen. And nothing did. So I guess for now, we will see how that goes.
So at this point I have to ask myself; is it ok to not care when my mother tries to kill herself?
'Well how much do you think you owe to put it right?'
What can we expect from the future? Visionary and futurist Barbara Marx Hubbard sees the emergence of a new type of human. She calls this being a Universal Human, and quite possibly the key to our survival as a species.
Best Live: Winner – NUTS (The Hall) / Highly Commended – LSUTV (Loughborough Poker Live Final)
For some reason, I saw worship as a mountain top, and I’d helicopter myself to the peak and then beckon everyone at the bottom to climb all the way up and join me.
I have no idea what they paid for each property but considering that they sold both of these properties on Obama’s watch, so to speak, it is obvious that some people are able to sell their properties.
But the very important distinction is (as the profile points out) that he overcame that. This atypical period of behaviour finished quickly. Throughout the entire 1990s and 2000s that was not a significant part of Brian Braddock's character, any less than it had been in the 70s and majority of the 1980s. Nor should it be today.
I joined a new street team on Etsy: Tampa Bay Etsy Crew. I'm hoping that this will be a way of meeting local crafters, forming some friendships, and maybe even a good resource for finding out about shows.
4 tbsp Dijon mustard
“If it’s any of your business, GB, I’ve got an appointment with my doctor,” replied the ringmaster getting irritated. “I think I may have picked up a chest infection.”
One-half red bell pepper, seeded and finely chopped
Thank you all so much for your support. I will continue visits to your blogs to keep in touch...
As early as 1915, this Courthouse was criticized as an unsanitary, dilapidated fire-trap, with sewerage problems and dangerous electrical wiring, but it wasn’t replaced until 1930. Ownership of the 1876 Courthouse reverted to the State, which tore off the old mansard roof and replaced it with a modern flat one. For its new role as a State office building, the structure was renamed the “Walton Building,” in honor of attorney William “Buck” Walton and, since it housed the Game and Fish Commission, Izaak Walton, author of “The Compleat Angler.” The Walton Building was demolished in 1964, but not before a mother pigeon, who had captured the public’s attention, was allowed to hatch her nest of eggs. The site of the 1876 Courthouse has been a parking lot for the last forty-two years.
The dancer said that she believes that she and belly dancers Dina and Fifi Abdo are the last of the best and all new comers are mere amateurs.
I think next time I need to sit under a bigger tree.
And now I’m almost eight as you can see
The Groundhogs—Split
I'm really excited about Easter this year because Lucy is old enough to do some festive activities with!
everything before that seems to be there and the drummer here is one
Its hard not having Sandra and Pitu at my side, having that support and assistance to keep me on track. The weather has been nice recently, but I'm lacking the drive to make the most of it, not feeling inspired much at all. I think this is just a dark cloud over me at the moment and looking for that ray of light.
Here, then, is the rub, and the central question that I kept asking myself as I read the book: Why do Beinart and his ilk expect their Zionist bride to be free of all blemish? And worse, what is the reason for their instinctively blaming the bride they allegedly love, without asking whether anyone else might bear some responsibility for the painful realities they witness?
You are defined by the legacy, the life, and the fruit that come out of you, not by what you take in.
My guess is that some beer commentators would describe this as being indicative of all that is wrong about large scale brewing of bland products. It really isn’t. There are worse things and indeed worst beers in the world. The only offence is trying to up the price of the grog they are selling. The standard brand sells for about 40-50p a can. They want to sell beer for more, so they introduce a spin off. If it works it works, if it doesn’t it doesn’t. My guess is that this will be short lived but I’ve been wrong before.
"You know how we've never heard about it before?"
This being said, the General now wants to lecture Canadians on being good citizens. He wants Omar Khadr home in Canada, free and with his family. After all he is “a child soldier”. The world has changed and so has Canada, General. The world is a far more cruel and dangerous a place than it was. People are trying to kill us because we are Canadians, General, and one of those people is... or was Omar Khadr.
I believe (that’s what it always is about, right?) that there is a supernatural side to things; but for me, it’s stuff we haven’t discovered beyond a theoretical stage—like the fourth dimension, or alternate universes, or simply things we cannot yet see or hear because our senses can’t detect them—like the critters in From Beyond that “share” our space, for example.
Heading up to Munster for our fifth Dark Lord day, there weren't the list of questions that normally float around the event. Or maybe those questions did still exist, but we've learned to just go with it.
I hope you enjoy some of these and please do put your own books of the year into the comments box!
(1) The Gingerbread Cookies
And, lucky us! If you love Jen's creations and are looking to have some customized, you can check out her Etsy shop here!
For surgery pics 2 days later, go to:
Hanging in a door way....
Literally, I've made every kind of banana bread combinations known to bakers, Bundt cakes, pudding and cupcakes, so what's left? Well, I thought...I've never made a cheesecake and, now I had a plan. However, I soon realized from the start that I didn't have graham cracker crumbs and had to substitute a package of Biscoff cookies that I did have. (You could have also use Nabisco Vanilla Wafers.) I had so many ideas of what could go with a banana cheesecake--salted caramel, chocolate chips, peanut butter; the list goes on, but I had just bought a flat of California strawberries and decided on a take of a banana split.
Sicko goes to the stall to buy some roses and Says goodbye to his friend Tammy.
Melt 2 Tbsp. butter in a large skillet over medium high heat. Add onion and cook until softened, stirring occasionally, 4 to 5 minutes. Add garlic and cook 1 minute longer. Scrape into slow cooker.
Directions for cooking the chicken: Place the chicken in a large pot and fill with water. Cover and bring to a boil. After it is boiling, reduce heat to a low boil uncovered. Let the chicken cook until it is easily shreddded with forks or a pair of tongs. I usually let it simmer about an hour. When it is falling apart, remove it a few pieces at a time to a large bowl and shred it. Pour the broth from the cooking pot over the shredded chicken, as you are shredding it, about a half cup at a time. This will prevent it from drying out. Add just enough liquid to be absorbed back into the chicken. Save the rest of the liquid from the pot and use it to make Spanish Rice or any other dish calling for chicken broth.
They have executed the most daring kinds of attacks and have a higher horror profile than the JAT with regards to foreigners killed. Yet, while the United States considers JAT good for listing as a Foreign Terrorist Organization, it doesn’t consider Boko Haram enough threat to its strategic interest.
I LOVE TO PLAN!
The books have some pretty detailed sexual content, and a lot of it.
Alas, you must wait for the rest.
Progress feels good.
It's time to change trains and the station porter is giving Bob and Betty directions to the Underground. But hasn't anyone noticed that creepy stranger standing right behind them?
* 47th Annual Spring Sale: furniture, treasures, electronics, toys, kitchenware, linens, snack sporting equipment, shoes, books, jewellery, men’s, women’s, and children’s clothing…
into who won and who lost - so who
2. That I caused the foregoing complaint to be prepared and have read and understood the allegations thereof;
TB: The circuit was established as a tool to book high calibre artists for the area, as no one series could justify expenses alone to bring in specific artists. The circuit created a platform that made the opportunities for the artists more viable and served to create regular communication between the southwestern Ontario slams.
And, last but not least, I've become a Twi-hard. I loved the movie so much, I went and bought the books. I just finished New Moon. I'll start Eclipse sometime this week.
That she is beautiful but she don't mean a thing to me.
Bringing dishes, pots & pans, & food back in from where it was stored in the guest room!
innumerable. Whenever you set out to pray in other tongues refuse all forms of
In this anomaly, the umbilical cord is inserted directly to the fetal membranes instead of inserting to the middle of the placenta. The cord then travels to the membranes of the placenta where the exposed vessels are not protected by Wharton’s jelly which poses a high risk of rupture. This condition may be associated with fetal anomalies.
The whole world feels like home.
If it is bad policy to allow for Customs to decide patent infringement, the Govt. should amend the IPR Import Rules. Judges cannot ignore the most obvious literal interpretation just because they disagree with it. If this order is used as a precedent, the Delhi HC would have effectively amended the IPR Import Rules, 2007 to exempt patents from these
Photo - Juli and her little daughter flew from Texas to be here when our 12th baby was born. Sadly, I went way over my due date and she missed it by nearly a week. It would have been awesome having her here but it worked out that 4 months later at our son's wedding she got to meet and hold her newest baby sister. So very glad I had my camera in hand that day!
In a garden it cannot sprout
I hope this little list saves you from the dreaded group stare, the “oohhh — well, oh, that’s different”, the cold shoulder at the punch table. ’Cuz anyone who says that women are the gentler sex has never been to a Gift Shower.
Nome do Lab: Using Dynamic Access Control to Automatically and Centrally Secure Data in Windows Server “8″
Speaking about the partnership Anssi Rantasalo, Chief Executive Officer of Kemppi, commented; “We have been supporting Valtteri Bottas for several years and this agreement is a natural continuation of that collaboration. It is a great honour for us to be associated with the Williams F1 Team, one of the most successful teams in the history of Formula One. We are looking forward to extending our collaboration with them towards a technology partnership, as Formula One is technically demanding and welding still has an important role to play.”
Here’s where it gets really interesting, from a social media point of view. People have been commenting about this since Monday. At first it starts out as you might expect – people saying posting his name and files on FB is going too far, might be infringing on his civil liberties, and is unneccessary since all students were already emailed the facts.
Fourthly and perhaps most importantly, nobody wants to fail a die roll. It’s not fun. Even if it creates no consequences, rolling low IS NOT FUN. Again, too many game designs forget that one of the fundamental concepts of rpgs is rolling a dice and feeling personal achievement (however misplaced) when you roll a 20, and feeling personal failure when you roll a one. It’s silly but it is undeniably true. We know this. Studies have shown that people who play poker machines believe they have a skill, and get the same sense of accomplishment when they win as they do when winning a game of skill or completing a task. Anyway, the point is, low rolls create downbeats, even if they have no consequences, and nobody wants to roll down their skill list in a row because they risk those downbeats. Take away the risk of failure, as Gumshoe does, and you can rattle off every skill on your sheet – and so you do.
Have you had professional photos taken for press purposes or book jackets? Did you go to a photographer who specialized in this sort of photography, a regular portait photographer, or someone else? Do you have a press kit assembled to send out for publicity and other purposes?
When Steve Weddle asked me to write a WHAT I’VE LEARNED guest post for Do Some Damage, I accepted the challenge with enthusiasm. After four years, I must’ve learned something, right?
What shall we say about such wonderful things as these? If God is for us, who can ever be against us? Since he did not spare even his own Son but gave him up for us all, won’t he also give us everything else?
And now for the update on the “Sue Bonnie Kaye” case. Brien is sending this letter to authors:
Hi everyone! Today I made a card for the sketch challenge on the Clean & Simple stamping blog found here. For this challenge we were to create a one layer card using the following sketch-
The Student Citizen: Learning Through Work & Community Engagement
Tour in an old Citroen 2CV (expensive but fun)
And made consciousness flow as a natural river across high azimuthal superconductive fields
This post is just a suggestion that reviews and star ratings should just be taken with a grain of salt. Looking at review behavior can give you more in-depth look at a restaurant's success. I'm using the word "success" loosely. You can define it however you like.
Chicha can also refer to a style of music created by Peruvian hipsters in the 1960s and '70s, best described as a psychedelic mash-up of surf guitar, cheesy analog keyboard sounds and a funky Amazonian take on cumbia. A group from Brooklyn, Chicha Libre celebrates the lo-fi virtues of old-school chicha on its latest album, Canibalismo.
** It is rumored that other demon lords can create Devil-Men by different means.
So here’s an offering for the rainiest week this winter.
7:30am: zzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz
“Europe is today the only force capable of carrying forward a project of civilization. … America and China have already begun the conquest of Africa. How long will Europe wait to build the Africa of tomorrow? While Europe hesitates, others advance.”
9. Becky Hammon – San Antonio Silver Stars
It was a strange yet interesting beast. It had a bold and robust whisky nose that leapt out of the glass that carried through into the initial mouthful. It had strong peat, wood and smoky notes that gave way to a really smooth, round and very well balanced sour apple taste.
Egyptian husbands will soon be legally allowed to have sex with their dead wives - for up to six hours after their death.
I think one of my favorite scenes I've ever written was the one with Sinjin and Jolie in Sinjin's tent. I wanted him to come off as pure sexiness in that scene and hopefully he did!
First, I ate a big bowl of yummy fall-perfect apple crisp, and didn't have to share with anyone. Then I spent the rest of nap time reading all my favorite blogs, as many of you probably noticed with the several comments I left! Y'all kept me busy, I'll tell you that. It was pure bliss. The only sound in my house was me typing away my comments.
Michael Bradley Finnegan, 37, Basking Ridge, N.J.
STRUT! The Magazine Issue II: The Red, White, Blue & Glitter Edition is available to order now… and will be distributed May 2012! Expect more talk about walking in confidence, more tips on walking in competence and more tools to walk in conviction. This issue features: Supermoms Who STRUT, Daddies and their Daughters, The Not-So-Average STRUT, A Soldier’s STRUT and a host of interviews and articles sure to enlighten and empower. If you have tiptoed around your dream, the stories in this edition are sure to stir up your faith and embolden you to STRUT into your destiny. For $10, order online at www.freedomink365.com.
So I'm blogging about it and adding a promise to pick back up my big girl underpants and make this blog more ... well.. bloggy. I have some Valentine projects in the works and will show soon.
Got any simple to make recipe recs for farmers market fare for me? Please do share! And maybe I'll see you guys around at TheHFM sometime!
That means that responsible parents and guardians should not take anything for granted and should learn the indicators of sex trafficking so as to prevent their children falling prey to such abuses and to be able to curtail any abuse to which their children may have already been exposed.
LS. Manny walks into the office very slowly, the expression on his face a little too serious. Just before this scene, he is coming here to get money from his wife's life insurance policy to pay for dental work she needs. The length of the shot invites us to see a man we have spent time with as somewhat shift-looking.
Cabinet shelving/Bookshelves
The modern home ornament designs consecrate an esthetic mite to your shelter. They are major and rich construction of adding call to your home. You can design your shelter by using ornamental accessories similar area rugs, sheepskins, image frames and mirrors. You can straight use ace rose items equal candles and holders to furnish the interiors of your home. The modern country rugs are one of the items which can be utilized to adore the floors of the domiciliation. They can be initiate in plenitude of patterns and with swish intricate prints. These rugs are mainly set at the hypnotize of the apartment.
I know, a lot of people will instinctively disagree with that. They may well be right, and it's not something I normally feel about projects. I do believe that a skilled writer can made a good feature into a short, a book into a feature, a short into a concept that can spiral into a series. Whatever the medium, I think the core of a story can often be told.*
Right after that he said he wanted a "sister baby" but the video got cut off. I mean if that isn't inspiration, I don't know what is. Hahaha. Just a daydream at this point ladies, just a daydream. :)
Me, on the other hand,
*Item reviewed was purchased using my own money*
"Now it is we who are governing, let us do the right thing for ourselves."
6. In the bowl, mix re-fried beans, little water, garlic, taco seasoning, vegetable stock, and jalapeno and microwave for 1 minute.
Brinjals, 2pc, cut into bite sizes
An’ for every hung-up person in the whole wide universe
After what feels like another long, busy week (despite the Bank Holiday), it's time to boogie!
rather than descending.
I have been working on the Library and the pictures will show you the progress so far. The one below will give you a good idea of how I will arrange this room. I still have the Cornice and Skirting boards to do as well as the ceiling and lighting. I am adding more trim to the openings of the bookshelves to give them a more detailed edge. The alcove on the left side is going to have a "Banquette" with pillows to sort of indicate a cozy reading spot. The furniture you see is not what will actually be used. I will be making the sofa and many other pieces that I will post about when I begin them. I have also to do the firebox and I am doing that in a "Herringbone" brick pattern ala "Josje". She gave a great post on this type of firebox and I have to do it. Thank you "Josje"!
They had planned a petition drive in early November after Friday prayers in Nasr City, a suburb to the east of downtown Cairo. What could be more harmless than a secular, peaceful, quiet, request for signatures in a middle-class neighborhood on the weekend?
Save $0.30 when you buy TWO CANS any size/variety Pillsbury Refrigerated Grands! or Grands! Jr. Biscuits.
Do you see the shepherd guiding you?
Will Hodge forever be;
Porter
I should have been doing cartwheels. Our eighteen-year-old son could get a new lease on life? Instead, I was skeptical, like any good journalist. “Ellen, there’s no chance. Do you know how long something like that would take?”
Whatever. I'm totally in love, and don't care.
it's as if the bird hovering over the one dimensional map
It's time for another challenge at Shopping Our Stash! This week we ask you to make a masculine card. I know, I know, those are tough! But as always, we give you options: you can use masculine colors (navy, brown, red, blues, etc.), or a masculine theme, or anything for a boy or with a boy theme. I'll bet you have at least one piece of not-frilly paper in your stash you can resurrect for a card - you know, something you bought so you'd have it around, just in case? Yeah, that paper.
A little background is required to tell this story correctly. When I went to college many moons ago, I had no idea what to major in. I was interested in many things, and considered many things, but somehow decided to major in Art. (One in a long line of mistakes, probably, but for the sake of keeping this story short(ish), I won't go there).
So what might we begin to generalize from these results? We might assume that angry men do not cause very much dissonance, thus we do not need to complete extra mental work to make them fit in our current mental constructs. As for an angry female, though, it might not fit in our current understanding. Thus we assume that the angry female must have many personal faults. Once again, we would rather someone else be at fault, than to be at fault in our own judgements! This is a dangerous way of thinking. Well let’s see what Brescoll and Uhlmann (2008) did next.
It’s the most crass and cynical brand of politics imaginable, the Chicago Way writ large: pay to play justice from the nation’s highest law enforcement official.
What can happen if your body pH is too acid?
As you can see in the photo I have added a bird to the perch. Although this is not included in the paper crafting project kit I wanted to show you how I add the bird to my seasonal display. Right now we seem to have cardinals everywhere and my 6 year old loves to spot them so I thought she would have great fun seeing one in our living room each day.
Bear’s grades haven’t been good. My Uncle is more worried more about her social life than anything else. Him and his fiance (who doesn’t want kids) are doing a fine job of manipulating Bear into what works for them. It seems he is trying to push us out of the picture with one excuse after another and it just feels like we are losing the little control we have. We always knew this would get worse.
14oz can artichoke hearts, drained and chopped
What happens when the earth starts to soften up and there’s more light? Even the terrorists change. I invite you to watch for it, Human Being; I invite you to watch all of it. You can watch some things happen that you didn’t expect. When the Soviet Union fell over, how many of you had the answers of why that took place without a civil war? It was because that old energy was no longer supportable by the Humans who lived there. There comes a time in the physics of consciousness where if you do not have a cooperative group of Human Beings who will agree with an old energy precept, it cannot be sustained. What happens when the majority of the world doesn’t want war anymore? You are actually seeing this develop. Has anyone told you that you are “overdue” for another world war? In 3D, you are. Within the paradigm of the old energy, you are.
After the show, we went to McMenamins for more drinks and some food, but it was getting late and we were getting tired. Walking back to my old roommate’s apartment (because I wasn’t walking back to mine by myself), we encountered a group of drunk guys fighting (not going to lie, it was quite frightening) and luckily I was able to get a ride home, so I didn’t have to worry about running into more drunk people.
Then how is she managing it all own her own? Judy admits she would not have been able to start-up at all without winning the NESTA founding, called Starter for six and the JOLOMO award. She learned a lot of what she knows about business from NESTA support, where she got lectures on things like cash flow and yearly projections, something I think we all accept at this stage we know nothing about. She jokes as long as you keep all your invoices extremely organised and can bribe a friend to help you, you’ll be fine. Nesta provides you with enough money to start-up but she says she would advise us to try to not to spend so much money when just starting out. After Nesta she entered the JOLOMO award, an award set up by the artist John Lowrie Morrison to encourage and recognise young emerging talent. She said she was completely broke before JOLOMO so has always described it as the stepping stone to her career.
1/2 can (about 6 ounces) coconut milk
Now, admittedly, I read a lot of Young Adult fiction (Harry Potter, Hunger Games, Inheritance Cycle, etc) and you’d think I could come up with a plot somewhere along those veins, especially since the story is also a mix of supernatural-type stuff. There’s a … fantasy element? It’s got super powers. There.
Credit for child care. If you have kids under age 13 and pay for care while you work, you could qualify for the child-care tax credit. You can count up to $3,000 in child-care expenses for one child, or up to $6,000 for two or more children. The size of the credit gradually shrinks as your income increases. Families who earn less than $15,000 can claim a credit for 35% of qualifying expenses; families who earn more than $43,000 can get a credit for 20% of eligible costs. Expenses that count toward the credit include day care, preschool, before-school and after-school care, summer day camp, and a nanny or other babysitter. You may also be able to take a credit worth up to $200 if you’ve maxed out the money from your flexible-spending account to pay for child care and you have two or more children and spent more than $6,000 on their care. See IRS Publication 503 Child and Dependent Care Expenses.
We had a beautiful day here, FINALLY! It was warm; it was sunny; it was a smidge windy... so, I made sure to stay away from the house and car as I painted. (Lesson learned the hard way) I took my two purchases and my new Krylon Oil Rubbed Bronze spray paint from my swag bag and headed out to make more spray paint marks on our driveway. There are several spray paint outlines of previous victims there as well.
We apawlogize for being MIA for almost a month now. Our lives haven't been too exciting lately. Swisher has been the main priority around here. We wanted to update you guys about him since you all sent that good Juju juice. As you can see, he's still wearing the Cone of Shame and is not 100% better yet.
Oh, can’t you see it’s such a sin?
Our motorcycles have been in storage for several years now as we were living overseas and then traveling around for quite awhile. As we have temporality landed in Houston again, we are attempting to re-learn to ride – well – and trying to get the motorcycles back in good working order. Both prospects have turned into long and unsatisfying projects.
Then, rinse the blossoms in lightly salted water.
What was the first thing you learned when you moved to the UK?
Rosen recommends implementing mobile-device management systems to deal with multiple operating systems more smoothly, while also addressing security, monitoring and technical-support issues more efficiently.
“There’s more to life,” you say. Well, don’t ask me what that is. I turn away from you, pick up the broom, sweep my dreams up and throw them in the bin. I’m scratchy rough when you taste me. I burn through your gut. I howl like the White Dog. Pour me into charred American oak. Maybe I’ll mellow. Just maybe it’ll change my tone.
Right, this is it for now. I love Winx each and every time I watch it. (& I've watched it a lot). I just notice more details in each episode, I understand the characters better, I love the girls and it's almost the only show I can say which cheers me up 100% (even when Naboo dies, the strength of friendship between the girls is a positive message to take away).
Take for instance Oprah Winfrey. In the early nineties dear Oprah decided to prove that with a little financial incentive, blacks would achieve ‘great things’. Oprah and friends devised a program. They sent out ads requesting volunteers to take part in a program that would provide them a pathway to ‘freedom’. Over two hundred fifty thousand people applied. Oprah and friends hand selected the best one hundred applicants from the lot.
This afternoon, as I passed by the now defunct Buschlen Mowatt venue, a visit there came to mind. It was a ‘carborundum’, a word I had never heard of, that awed me with its textured beauty. Again Helen Frankenthaler’s work had captivated me that day years ago.
All right, fine then. But at least may they step in a pile of dog poo and track it all over their house before realizing what it is. Then I shall be satisfied.
The totally positively neurotic part of me says: "Heather........ I think I may be getting morning sickness".................
And it cannot change you
Revelation 11
“I am the way the truth and the life, no man cometh to the father but by me”.
Which is a slightly non-literal translation of what you get when your eight year old puts Journey’s "Wheel in the Sky" (video) on “repeat one” in his CD player.
This is basically Law #1 in reverse. In that scenario, the bad guy tricks his victim into downloading a harmful program onto his computer and running it. In this one, the bad guy uploads a harmful program to a computer and runs it himself. Although this scenario is a danger anytime you allow strangers to connect to your computer, websites are involved in the overwhelming majority of these cases. Many people who operate websites are too hospitable for their own good, and allow visitors to upload programs to the site and run them. As we’ve seen above, unpleasant things can happen if a bad guy’s program can run on your computer.
A fluffy and amazing rolls that can be shaped in many ways. The dough is so great to work with. I turned them into a roll stuffed them with thinly sliced banana and chocolate chip. Unlike the regular bread rolls, I didn't slice them before baking but bake them as a loaf.
That was about it, except, yes, I did go to Hard Rock Cafe Montreal. I'd never ever been to one, and I wanted to see what all the fuss was about. To be honest, I still don't know. It was perfunctory service, all MolsonCoors beers (the Molson Export I was served almost brought me to tears: I drank a lot of Ex in the 1980s, and this was a pale, sweet shadow of that beer), and stiff prices ($6.50 for a shaker pint of mass-market beer seemed extreme (please note my stupidity...I've since realized that this was NOT a shaker pint, it was actually a larger beer; my apologies)...especially since Jack and I both left 2/3 of our beers sitting on the bar (he'd got a Rickard's Red, which he repeatedly said was the worst non-infected beer he'd ever had). I guess I just don't understand what most people want from an evening out. Which is okay with me; I know what I want, and usually see that I get it.
Allah granted us success and accepted our efforts such that we have a historic outcome.
Robin: Family is important for everyone--from serial killers to saints, zombies and humans alike. And I include myself in everyone. During his lifetime, Jack thought he was a lone wolf. In death, he finds out that zombies need zombies.
I searched all over the library, with no sign of Amelia, with a sigh of relief I headed to the back corner and to the locked door.
*****This is my err, “special weapon”. Basically I used a beef flavored packet from a pack of ramen. It will give the chicken a helping hand in providing a rich meaty flavor. Just buy ramen and save the packets to cook with, they are like the poor man’s bouillon. If you are already using beef and/or have more spices on hand than just salt, pepper, and one source of spiciness, this is NOT required.
This year, I am implementing aerobics in my gym class. I plan on teaching students how to take their heart rate and calculate their BMI. I think it's imperative for kids to know just how important keeping active is. It's recommended that kids (and teens) get at least 20 minutes of good aerobic exercise 3 times a week. While searching online for some resources, I found many videos that I can use to show my students before they learn their own routine.
A couple of weeks ago my baby brother Michael and the Utah State Rugby team came to Boise for a tournament. We showed up fashionably late thinking that we would only need to wrestle 2 wiggly girls for 30-40 minutes. Wrong. We watched 30-40 minutes of rugby with no appearance by my brother :(
The possibilities that Gillian sees in the world, in each day...like the winter's day when she made a special trip to photograph this chandelier that was out in the snow...an incongruous combination perhaps, and yet, when Gillian does it, you see how it works.
YES concerts have always been very special events, and this winter’s “In the Present” tour, hitting a total of 30 cities in November and December, will be no different, as Steve Howe, Chris Squire and Alan White play selections from hit albums like Fragile, Close to the Edge, Tales from Topographic Oceans and 90125 along with audience favorites like “Roundabout,” “Owner of a Lonely Heart” and “I’ve Seen All Good People,” some of the enduring classics that have made YES the most influential and groundbreaking progressive group in rock & roll.
So that's all from me today...at work all day...so I will catch ya all laters..
23.- Teach your children to pray themselves.
while my husband cancelled the train
Congratulations too to Thornbridge, Shepherd Neame, and BrewDog, who also brought home some silverware for the cabinet.
This is a great way for people who do not have a blog, of which there are many,
Last week, we were still going strong with our gingerbread adventures! Here are some of our centers!
I used the Stampin Up embossing folder Elegant Bouquet on the rectangular piece of So Saffron. I thought it complimented the designer paper so well, I wrapped white and teal twine around the card and it just finished my card.
My sweet Kathlyn,
For nearly two decades, Kirk Franklin has been a multi-platinum-selling purveyor of majestic fusions of gospel and contemporary music. Franklin is a pioneer in gap-bridging musicianship, uniting audiences across gospel, hip hop, pop and R&B. His irresistible rhythms and rhapsodies have resulted in albums that consistently top both Billboard's Gospel and Christian charts, as well as ascend in to the Top 10 of the mainstream R&B/Hip Hop chart. Franklin is also the host and executive producer of the gospel talent show "Sunday Best," the highest-rated gospel program in BET network history now heading into its fifth season. To date, Franklin has garnered nine GRAMMY® Awards, an American Music Award, 39 Stellar Awards, 16 Dove Awards (CCM), eight NAACP Image Awards, two BET Awards, a Soul Train Award, and numerous others.
“Oh! Very nice,” he said, with the famous Indian head-wigggle. (Is it a head nod, or it is shaking the head to say “no”? After three weeks in various parts of India, I don’t even think Indians know for sure.)
Although the skirt was still $99.00 on sale (regular price $149.00 - gulp), it was an extra 30% off on top of that...and I like spending birthday money on stuff I wouldn't normally buy for myself. The skirt is called the "Ella" skirt and the colour is "mushroom." (I love mushrooms). It's going to get a lot of wear in the warmer months, but it was nice to be able to wear it during a snowy day. It's even polyester, so I'll be able to wash it (a good thing with that light colour!).
Price: $11.49
Today we tried to get our school work done fairly early so we could take some time to celebrate Fat Tuesday! We did! Boy, we sure had fun. We made a craft, talked about the history of the King's Cake, and had a surprise dinner for all. What a blast!
TOMORROW: address the needs and preferences of individual consumer online and in-store
bands. Lemmy (whose real name is Ian) prefers to label their
Creepy lurking clown sold separately.
- david sylvan - a victim of the stars 1982-2012 - virgin records - 2012
While our Republican governor and Republican-controlled legislature still can't come to an agreement over how to finance public schools, and there is some possibility that the schools are just going to run out of money one day and shut down until the powers-that-be get their respective thumbs out of their respective asses and come up with a solution that isn't about giving tax breaks to the rich, our schools are struggling to do the best they can with fewer and fewer dollars. *
The Swans of the Manasa Sarovara are “of cheerful hearts, of great speed and capable of going everywhere at will and equal unto Garuda himself in range and speed of flight. They are birds of tireless wings. They were capable of going everywhere at will. They traverse the whole Earth, and amongst winged creatures were always applauded for the length of the distances they traversed.”
Sophie loves the animals on each page, whom make the water their home
3. Nishabd
This book doesn’t exactly beg to be a treat on which you nibble day by day, though it should be read that way. As Is would make a great source for daily reading, devotion or musing and may spark in the reader something new to consider. Finch’s writing is low on the God factor (making her appealing to readers such as myself) but remains holy in its depth of awareness and understanding. Although I blew through this book to make some deadlines and move on to other books I need to read, I highly recommend savoring As Is over the course of time. And then putting it on your shelf to come back to later.
Common Market – It has no barriers to trade between member countries, includes a common external trade policy and allows factors production to move freely between members. Labour and capital are free to move because there are no restriction on immigration, emigration, or cross border flows of capital between member countries. A common market demeans a significant degree of harmony and cooperation on fiscal monetary, and employment policies. It is been very difficult to achieve it.
BIG QUIZ (LBC)
One more partisan Bush U.S. state attorney is allowed to apply a wrecking ball to the legal system by one of the most cowardly Attorney Generals the USDoJ has even had. In support of which claim, two words: Don Siegelman.
The last couple of weeks I have been reading Charles Murray‘s new book Coming Apart in my spare time. It is a worthwhile book to read, written by a careful researcher. One thing that struck me as strange for such a well researched and informative book was the use of graphs starting at some number such as 0% and rising to say 5% and comparing it to graphs starting at say 0% and running to 100%. A serious problem arises because a change from 1% to 5% is a 400 percent increase but a change from 95% to 99% is only a 4% increase.
Creak.
1/2 tsp thyme
Never surrender to those who harm you.
I have enjoyed using the Everyday Enchantment DSP from the Sale-a-bration, so I thought I'd used it for my birthday card post today. I have some birthdays coming up in May. I used the Sweet Summer stamp and flower punches. The DSP coordinates beautifully to my image that is why I used it.
He said: “We apologise for that, but anticipate the vast majority of community members will be patient and understanding.
Such as the “track,” where the connection to suburbia is found in the dismal design of tract housing replete with absentee sidewalks, cul-de-sacs and boredom. The tracks are known as extremely violent places, so-called “red ghettos”, where poor, drunk Indians are struck for the rest of their lives. Or at least this is the image must people associate with the rez– Treuer recalls one white journalist not believing she had crossed the border until the track was in sight. It is another in a long line of images that seeks to connect Indians to an inescapable destiny. Most Americans view Indians as not only stuck in this hopeless place but also in an out-of-synch time.
On the upside I did discover a new use for my Kindle, it’s a great editing tool!
Here are some of my favorite poems, speeches, letters, sermons, and sayings. New passages will be added from time to time.
I'm entering this in Mo's Digital Pencil II challenge - Any Holiday or Celebration. Well, I'm celebrating it still being Spring here in Australia, which is what the image reminded me of when I was colouring it in. I love Mo's images, they are certainly magical.
an old steak knife :)
What we call it matters not one whit. How we get it done is the key.
Keep the remembrance of our song
In other words, they thought…that David would not be able to dealing with the disappointment of losing his child. Yes…his DREAMS WERE SHATTERED. But David himself was not shattered. His world underneath his feet has been shaken, but HIS HEART had remained steadfast. He also understood that even though he could not change the heart of God in the matter, he could touch the heart of God in WORSHIP.
Back Door
I was supposed to go to the theatre to see The Hunger Games with Sidney and my collegue. Unfortunately, my collegue didn't have time the next few weeks, so we decided to go, just the two of us.
I’m not into science or gadgetry like some people are, so it’s entirely possible that I’m missing something super cool about this thing, but to me it seems pretty pointless.
It ain't.
James Gerard Geyer, 41, Rockville Centre, N.Y.
I never liked the one with lime.
“You know what I mean Socrates! Why don’t you put that money in the bank? What if someone breaks in and steals it?”
As soon as you know exactly why your best fitting pair of shoes fit so well, locate shoes which have comparable design or are made from comparable materials, and you must not have too many problems ordering the selection of shoes on the web.
Taking a closer look at what is perceived as some of the worlds most sophisticated cuisines, you will see that they often are a cross-road of cultures. Places where different cultures have met and exchanged their ideas, values and of course ingredients.
18. The Moving Shadow - People's Favorite Magazine Jun 10
A Sociological Look at Blood Quantum
3 tbsp red wine vinegar
White Cat is about the curse workers. It’s set in a world like ours but one where magic is established, well known and feared. Unlike a lot of paranormal fiction where all the magic stuff happens behind the scenes and the greater public live their daily lives completely ignorant of the vampires, werewolves and what-nots living amongst them here the magicians (curse workers) are a part of society, even if it’s the criminal part. It that sense White Cat is similar to Tru Blood, the vampire series about the vampire world attempts to integrate with the normal, mundane world.
brown chicken in 1 teaspoon butter. Transfer to an 11-in. x 7-in.
Folk for the soul and for sighs
Irish moss and yeast nutrient last 15 minutes.
Tina policed the equipment levels, and kept her new master in good company. Felicon Whisper was sodden and incoherent most of the time. A diet of mellow and hydrating dinks was all he needed, as long as production held out. His goons never stopped supplying the hole with new energy sources. They made sure the slaves were fed and watered, and otherwise miserable. As these dregs of society were used up, their bodies were flung by trebuchet into the midst of the abyss, doomed to rot where they fell at the depths of hell. However deep that was nobody seemed to know, but sometimes the memory of death wafted up from the infernal crypt to perfume the stale air.
I must admit that although I claim to despise technology I can’t imagine my life without it. Which makes me a hypocrite, I know. A big portion of my time is spent on the computer and I rely on cameras to see eye to eye with my passion for photojournalism, to name an example. Which on the other hand is the very reason why I look at technology askance, ironically: my life in commune with nature and conversations with real people is slowly getting blurred in the face of these fancy technological devices.
And we were last again a year later.
I love you despite your wickedness
The next day, unfortunately for us, it rained. By the time we had woke up, we had arrived at The Great Stir Up Island that the cruise line owned. The ship had to stay out in the ocean so it didn’t get stuck in shallow waters so there was smaller boats to take us from the ship to the island. It had not stop raining by that time. On the way there, the boat rocked so much from the winds and rain that I thought it was going to flip over. I was literally scared out of my mind because I don’t know how to swim. By the time we had got to the island the rain was much heavier and we just decided to take a few pictures and head on back to the ship without getting off the boat. Again we had to endure the ride back to the cruise ship and again, we got scared because not only did the boat rock, we had to stop the boat completely to wait for the other boat to leave, twice!
"Can't we just have it in a holographic night club?" Will Riker suggests, "After all, it is the Enterprise Christmas Party. Visitors will just have to accept it the way it is."
Your preferred prize
May your joys be as bright as the morning,
Now, she is a fit and fabulous nearly 55 year old who lifts heavier weights than me in some tracks and stands front centre of my classes!! She knows when it's time to put the work in and has done 4 Pump classes and a step class plus a long walk this week to kickstart her 2011 after indulging a little over the festive season. Go Mum!! I am sooooooo proud you!!!
By early December 2001, over 6,500 tons of munitions had been dropped on Afghanistan by US-led NATO forces, including approximately 12,000 bombs and missiles. By the end of March 2002, over 21,000 bombs and missiles had been dropped, murdering well over 3,000 Afghan civilians in air strikes. In the first two months alone, Afghan civilians were killed at an average rate of 45 per day.
I found this novel a pretty good introduction to a new author and I will be definitely reading the others I have soon (well soon-ish. My TBR pile is out of control!)
So, I think we can remove any preconceptions of 18-24 year old boys dominating theaters and the marketplace. The marketplace is not dominated by anyone or anything. Movies are not made and marketed for all people of all age groups. The budget on a movie can be anywhere from $5 million to $200 million and the object is to make more than that in the box office, dvds, etc. There are plenty of viewers to make that happen.
Have a great week everyone.
A church that preaches homophobia is an enemy to God, provided we believe that God wants to be known by us. We must reclaim God’s gifts to us, for without them, we will never truly know how to know God. Until we have seen beauty in the world, we cannot understand the world. The stoic masculine ideal sees beauty only as a means to sexual gratification. I tell you, having experienced true feeling, that there is beauty in all things deep within. Sadly, we have been blinded to this sight, this sight of the ubiquity of beauty. Dig for it, find it, and you will have found the seed and soul of personhood.
C) a planet opposite Earth on the other side of the sun.
The event began with a talk from sex trafficking survivor and former SDSU student Natasha Herzig, who gave an intense account of her abduction and time spent in the underground world of sex trafficking.
Mom leashes me and leads me to the car.
While I was working in the kitchen at Wendy’s, manning the bacon station (and for those who know me well, know this is a perfect fit for me) I realized that I was learning quite a lot during my time. What could a fast food restaurant (quick service restaurant as my friend who owns the restaurant would say) teach me?
I hope everyone enjoyed today's card and I hope you'll stop by tomorrow to see what else I've got planned. And don't forget to follow my blog! The button is located on the right side and I would really appreciate it. :::puppy dog eyes::: See you all tomorrow!
I love how Cassie is always throwing little bits out to us with teasers, trailers, etc. as we eagerly await her next Mortal Instruments book.
But then, that begs the question: personal for whom? The director, or just you? Obviously, my opinion that Shutter Island is a work of tortured personal expression is not one that is universally shared; as an example, Rizov cites a takedown of the film by Elbert Ventura at the online magazine Slate in which Ventura calls the film "silly and impersonal." I wouldn't want to put words in Mr. Ventura's mouth, but maybe that just really means that he couldn't get into it, that maybe he found himself feeling emotionally detached from the whole thing, and then figured that that detachment was Scorsese's fault.
Jean Raspail, The Camp of the Saints (1973)
The lawsuit, filed in Ocala on April 20 and announced Monday by the Florida Civil Rights Association, which is representing Lelia Jackson-Burch, alleged violations of civil rights, defamation and false imprisonment.
These exercises will not only help you stand from a chair unassisted but also improve your ability to walk up and down stairs, reach for something on a high shelf and improve your balance.
Moriarty plunders the writings of philosophers, poets and mystics to reiterate this. On page 215 of Invoking Ireland he quotes Jacob Boehme: “In man is all whatsoever the sun shines upon and heavens contains, also hell and all the deeps.”
Basically I’m less cranky and more happy!
that's not for some sad diabolical god
As Jimmy gets the take down, it looks like Quin twisted his knee at a bad angle as he went down. Quin yells out “Ah, my knee” and the referee stops the fight based on a verbal tapout.
01. I Am A Man Of Constant Sorrow (Radio Version) - Soggy Bottom Boys Feat. Dan Tyminski / 3:10
Life with a three year old can really wear a mama down. Make sure you take time to rejuvinate yourself. If mama is all worn out, she's not going to have the patience or ability to think up ways of gently dealing with her kids. Go for a walk, around the house, if that's all you can muster. Lock yourself in the bathrooom for a few minutes of alone time. It's okay if you need time to be away from your child. This is not a sign of a bad parent, but of one who knows their limits, and is wise enough to get help when they can. Allow dad to parent for an hour or two - grandparents work as well!
Well can you believe I am posting again?! haha! This is my very first card since my renovations. This past weekend we just celebrated a dear friend's "21st" birthday and so I had to make her a card. Her favorite color is blue and I wanted to make it special and different. So of course I had to go to Mama's blog to juice up my inspirations. I saw this on her blog a little while ago and wanted to give it a try. She called it a telescope tag/card. You can check out her post here. she has the links to where she got her inspiration from. I decided to use my lacey nesties for the outside and I just bought a new nesties for the largest circle called: Picot Edge Circles. It really is elegant.
It was so sad knowing that they have to be separated after all the things they’ve been through in 12 episodes. They have shared love, happiness and tears during the filming of this Hello Baby season 5. I hope they will meet again someday.
1C Oil
We limp to You, our only hope
So, to quote a local Limerick blogger of note, 'You can FUCK THE FUCKITY FUCK OFF' back under the rock from whence you crawled. (Sorry 'bout the language Pat!)
Ray was considered one of the most beautiful actresses on the London stage
You always have something to say.
easier to move and blend on the image, than other w/c products.
Chrys.: Or otherwise: the Lord proposed this parable to them with this intent, that not understanding it they should give sentence against themselves; as was done by Nathan to David. Again, when they perceived the meaning of the things that had been said against them, they said, “God forbid.”
What follows is my best recollection of the dialogue that subsequently developed....
Yet, take a recent dream of mine. My whole family -- my mom, my dad and my sister -- is together. We know my father is going to commit suicide at the end of the day, and we also know that there is nothing we'll be able to do to stop it. So, in my dream, we must go through the day, knowing full well how it will end.
Basran shows that this betrayal is experienced in every relationship in a young woman’s life. The mothers “Bollywood-ing” up their daughters to impress the mothers of bachelor sons, the aunts spying on the girls and gossiping about their behaviour creating ghastly rumours, the young married women insulted by young unmarried women because it is not fair that they have not followed suit, a mother negotiating the return of her daughter to her extremely abusive husband, a mother beating her daughter because she was sexually harrassed by a carful of young men because she must have instigated it…the betrayal is endless.
These however are the most important things I have taken away from the weekend.
Violet Rain is finished, but now I’m stuck trying to get a score for it.
by Helen Gerety, Service Initiatives Coordinator, One Good Deed Chicago
Mr Grundlingh said he was involved in a minor accident around 8pm and on his way to the Swartkops police station to report it when a car swerved in front of him on the Swartkops bridge, causing him to stop.
However, the problems start with the meat. The plot picks up considerably. Clive is scheming. Sam is scheming. The Mob comes. The Mob threatens. Mae is scared. Quig is helpless. The painter, the lonely man at the counter, is, well . . . you’ll see. When the action quickens and the dialogue pitches higher, things get a little out of hand. Once the mob gets involved, the play takes on the quality of a gangster film, which are still a joy to watch but cannot help but come across as a bit hokey to a contemporary audience. We seem to know the characters well -- we seem to have them figured out.
More sacrilege was to follow though, in the form of unrepentent gluttony. The first course was Truffle, Gold, Egg. Which arrived in an eggshell, with a straw. Which would be the first time in my life I've had to suck eggs through a straw. And I loved it. Inside the delicate eggshell was the most ethereal scrambled egg espuma, topped by fragrant truffle infused egg white, then gold leaf. A refreshing start to the meal, in concept, presentation, texture and taste.
In his 'Canterbury Tale', Chaucer first used the name,
(Blue shirt responds with smile – a big, big, smile.)
Cut a strip about 1 inch wide and 20 inches long of fabric(it doesn't have to be perfectly cut as you can see) =) Cut a 2 and a half inch circle from cardstock(this will be what you adhere your fabric to). **I like to cut my circle from coordinating cardstock just in case your paper peeks thru your fabric.
I’m the architect of this construction I call my life, and if there are any changes needed, it’s down to me. Sure I might call in contractors to help set up the scaffolding, build up some walls, break down others, do the jobs I can’t, but ultimately I am the project manager of this construction site, because I am the one who drew the blue print, I’m the one who had the vision, I’m the one who lives here!!!
I will be blogging Part II of this post later this week, where I will explain in details the experiments done by Seyfarth and Cheney on vervet monkey alarm calls.
“I think we should be allowed to wear whatever we want,” says feisty 21-year-old Dominica Williams. “If we want to wear pyjamas we should wear pyjamas, if we want to wear a dress that shows everything we should be allowed to do so.”
Their criminal activities include wearing SANDF-uniforms to ‘coax illegal migrants crossing the border through the delapidated border fence into surrendering - and then holding them captive. The Ninjas will hold large groups of immigrants who crossed the border hostage in the bush or in mango groves on the ridge of the mountains, and will release one or two of them at a time to collect a ransom before the whole group is released. If they can’t manage to get the required ransom, the hostages are killed," said the source.
place of safety as this day falls into the next as it always does, without
Today's Brooklyn Record has news about Fresh Direct's expanding delivery zone. I thought it was available in all of 11225, but I'm not sure how to check. Anyone out there know the answer?
I’ve lived hurt
29Now after these things, the death of Joshua, the son of Nun, the servant of the Lord, took place, he being then a hundred and ten years old.
Shoes by Lucky Brand from Saks Fifth Avenue Off Fifth
October 9 @ Johnny Brenda's (Philadelphia, Pennsylvania)
- I start out with mixed beans and soak them overnight (pretty much any beans/lentils work really well!)…I had about 4 cups of cooked beans
If however you paid me £30,000 and paid another 6 people £30,000 each, then another 6 people and their families would be doing quite well. I would think that a higher percentage of that £210,000 would be put into the general economy as seven people spending money are likely to consume more than one wealthy person.
Learning objective is 1 more or 1 less
Occasionally, and very occasionally, Massachusetts gets it right, in the case of Scott Brown that was one of those times.
Everywhere we’ve been in Turkey we’ve had a lovely welcome. From the manager of the hotel last night (who was pleased to tell us he has a dog) to the stallholders and waiters we’ve met.
My sister and her husband weren’t home when I arrived at their place, so I ambled around the corner to the Baker Street Pub for lunch and some beer. The waitress drew my attention to a sale on Guinness 250 on draft, which was being offered for the bargain basement price of 2 bucks a pint. “Fill ‘er up says I.” I have to admit that Guinness 250 tastes better on draft, which shouldn’t come as a surprise. Perhaps it was the cut-rate price, too. At any rate, I liked it enough to have another one a few days later during a follow on visit.
The next day, we began again with Y, and again, the mix of discussion, music, multimedia and the moments of summing up theory worked very well for me; I was in awe of Y, to be honest, and wished we could have her teach more courses. The afternoon came and X proceeded to lecture with a slideshow, stating that X was “asked to give this lecture”. Throughout the afternoon, X repeatedly made snide side comments, such as, “For those people who need numbers…” and “For those people who need to write until they have carpal tunnel….” I felt attacked, and very uncomfortable. I hadn’t once said this, and I hoped that no other student had done so, either. It was a lecture on the specific horrible issues faced by the much maligned and abused Aboriginals of our country, and I wasn’t able to fully immerse myself because of the little barbs peppering it.
prior to buying this foundation, i was very curious about this brand and product. part of the intense curiosity stemmed from the fact that there are very few reviews on this foundation. and the reviews i did read/hear didnt go into too much detail. all i gathered from what i did research on was that the foundation had great coverage while still retaining an amazing skin-like finish. i had to try it out for myself.
On the other side you have the action of Pussy Riot recently in Moscow. In Russia, church and state are separated. Still the orthodox church was openly advising on voting for Putin. Pussy Riot performed in an orthodox church to protest against this illegal advise of the church. They got arrested 2 month ago without any bail, and are charged for hooliganism, and can get 7 years of prison for that.
But history was not yet done with the 6’4″ tall, lanky and awkward man. In 1856, Lincoln helped to found the Republican Party in Illinois. and became the party’s leader that May. The party would become a force to be reckoned with in the years to come, and from its fruition, Lincoln would once again return to Washington, D.C., this time as President of the United States. The platform of the Republican Party was founded on the abolitionist notions that slavery was a national sin, and should be done away with. But southern slaveowners and politicians viewed the new party as wanting to destroy their way of life, and vowed secession if a Republican became President. Lincoln was elected President in November of 1860; South Carolina voted to secede the following month.
Add chopped nuts and mix well. Set aside.
During National Crime Victims’ Rights Week, we commemorate the efforts of all who bring hope to crime victims during their darkest hour. As we reflect on the progress we have made toward ensuring fair treatment and full support for all crime victims, let us renew that fundamental American impulse to stand with those in need.
Qayum Karzai has served in Parliament and in other capacities in the Karzai administration while continuing to own three restaurants in Baltimore. Yet another brother, Shahwali Karzai, "runs his own engineering consulting firm and Mahmoud's real estate project," writes Risen. "Abdul Ahmad Karzai, who worked at the Baltimore-Washington International Airport before his brother became president, now works for the Afghanistan Investment Support Agency, which issues corporate licenses" -- licenses without which a corporation cannot legally operate in the country. Other relatives are living high on the hog thanks to contracts with the U.S. military.
My third confession is towards my roommates (Janardhanan, Noufal, Aneesh, Sharique, and Avinash) who are with me since January.
Shift down before the hill
The Cabinet’s decision came as a big disappointment to the Indian business delegation travelling to Pakistan with the Commerce Minister. Both Ficci president RV Kanoria and CII president B Muthuraman said they were disappointed that the Pakistan Cabinet could not finalise the negative list. The decision was not reflective of the opinion of the business communities in the two countries, which desired promotion of trade and economic relations, they added. Pakistan maintains a positive list of more than 1,900 items, which are allowed to be imported from India.
She carried throughout her life without fail her passion for music. She held her fiddle — received in her youth from her father — as her most treasured possession. From her days in the orchestra at Burris High School in Muncie, Ind., to recent concerts of original material with her husband, Chris Little, her voice and violin added sweetness to the air. She once paddled her fiddle across a rough, shark-filled ocean bay to provide music to a gathering of environmentalists. She recalled playing her fiddle with singer-songwriter Carole King at a forest protection event as a life highlight.
When a worldview becomes dominant it marginalises the opposing view and that is what has happened to traditional or national conservatism. Another complication is that new liberalism is different from classical liberalism.
Although, the original 1944 definition of vegan says that alternatives to using animals says that must benefit humans and the environment, these are part of veganism. But veganism does not replace these other movements. Veganism does not usurp or invalidate other environmental, ecological, human rights movements. Other rights movements do not need to be vegan in order to continue to fight their fight.
January 22,2006, World Social Forum Polycentric, Bamako,
1/2 cup cinnamon sugar
Growing up, I never read any of the Dead White Guys or Girls or Living White Guys or Girls. Besides Pride and Prejudice and Little Women; both giving to me when I was 9 years old; I did not have much contact with white writers growing up. I mainly read Black authors. Which is good for a black girl growing up.
Priya is trying her best to convince Srishti to follow her idea of marrying the boss. Srishti some how convinced by Priya and follows her footsteps.
I've been trying to follow the Winter Games on French TV and it's been a bit of a stretch. First of all, the coverage each evening flips back and forth between France 2 and France 3; the dude at the desk tells you to switch the channel and when you do, there he is again, picking up the commentary right where he left off. And second, naturally, the French coverage follows France's best hopes for medals. So the other night, we watched the women's 10K biathalon, you know the event where they cross country ski and shoot at targets. Americans don't do well in that event so I'm not sure I've ever even seen it. But the French had a crack competitor so we watched the live coverage (en direct as they say in French). The French gal came in third and we saw her crossing the finish line, tears of joy in her eyes. Now in that circumstance, what would the American networks do? Why go straight to an interview, another event, game over, story done. But not so here. We got to watch all 56 competitors slog their way to the end; I think there was even an American back in the pack there around number 46.
Question 4, conversation. Please decide whether the following subjects are appropriate for flirting with this woman. Your love of samba, your love of train sex, your love of sumptuous Italian food, your love of her beautiful hair, your mom, your ex girlfriend, your affair with your ex girlfriend’s mom. Well done, all correct. Now try this supplementary question. The woman seems to like you so you’ll become more intimate. Press the button when the subject matter stops being flirtatious and starts being inappropriate. I like you to come out to dinner with me. I like you to come a bit closer. I like to come all over you.
A development package, which included professional singing, dancing and stage-craft tuition was arranged for Ronan and the SYCO machine kicked into gear with the view of Ronan entering BGT 2010. Lots of work had been done with Ronan and his voice was much improved, unfortunately nerves were still a major issue for him and it was decided by SYCO not to
I'm Margit,
I don’t know rap and hip-hop well enough to comment much, but based on the heart=melody theory, rap seems to be light on the heart, and heavy on the body and brains. I could say the same about punk and hardcore. It would make some sense, because so many of those songs are conveying strength, anger, and toughness, and you don’t want to show too much emotion if you’re trying to win a fight. You want to show brains and brawn: words and rhythm.
The answers to number 1 and 2 above are: 1 – Racist Non-Christian Blacks (as confirmed by Genocide Watch), and 2 – Christians. Point 3 refers of course to the manner these savages go about accomplishing their despicable deeds. The modus operandi in many cases do not suggest that robbery is the primary motive, but rather a secondary one. This brings me full circle back to the concepts of “torture” and “terror”.
As the global media battle that has emerged from techno-confluence heats up, Rupert ‘Memory Man’ Murdoch could be forgiven for taking no interest in his offline flagship newspapers, the Times and Sunday Times. Which is a good thing, as he’s clearly taking no interest in them whatsoever. The tricky thing in this situation, however, is working out just who, among the Wapping Liars – is interested. The Business Section goes from bad to worse. A piece about changes in broadcast technology, for instance, has a shot of a girlie in flimsy top and crutch-gripping hotpants washing a car…underneath which the caption says ‘streaming movies is the new battleground’. Is Kelvin ‘Slug’ Mackenzie back in there somewhere doing his Salvador Dali impression?
16My face is red with weeping, and my eyes are becoming dark;
Through all of Jeth’s words, Jenro was thinking deep. He knew…he just couldn’t seem to believe that. There’s something in his heart that makes it so hard…so hard to swallow.
Main ingredient:
The Food Network has partnered with Share Our Strength, an organization dedicated to eradicating childhood hunger. On April 14th, the Food Network aired a documentary about childhood hunger in America through the eyes of three families in Texas, Virginia and New York City. If you missed it, you can watch it online. It will air again on the Food Network on April 21st at 6:00 p.m. EDT/5:00 p.m. CDT and April 23rd at 10:00 a.m. EDT/9:00 a.m. CDT.
Can’t you see
The court found that the Act did not prohibit frank public discussion of his act as "murderer" and did not prevent him being described as a "criminal".
March 5, 2009, 6:30 pm to 9:00 pm, Berkeley.
I for one can't wait to go back, for any occasion at all (and due to budget constraints, I normally don't repeat visits unless the place is amazing)! It is expensive - but SO worth it.
I’ll have to put them away for the summer very soon, but I’ve been able to still wear them some because of cool nights.
UPDATE 2: A kind anonymous commenter clued me in. David Lebovitz, who writes beautifully and hilariously about his delicious life as an ex-pat in Paris, linked to this post on his Facebook page. Clearly Mr. Lebovitz is an influental man around these circles. I am incredibly stoked. Thanks for the post, and best of luck on the kitchen remodel!
Firstly, Rights are a result of Man’s rational nature. There is no such thing as “collective rights” since there is no such thing as a “collective mind”. All rights are individual rights.
Datuk Seri Najib Tun Razak announced the halving of toll between Kajang and Kuala Lumpur effective yesterday, just months after the Prime Minister abolished it altogether for the Cheras-Petaling Jaya expressway.
installment, do we?" I think I have a fun idea for the next one, and
I mean, it IS my favorite photo of my arm muscles. But I didn’t really “race” that race even though I had a total blast and was super proud of my friend, Rae. So of course I can have good photos since I was pacing someone else and not pushing myself.
we'll wait to find out who's in there again – just like we did with the bonz. it's agonizing indeed but, for us, worth the wait.
Even childhood.
Tara Kelly strikes again! I loved this as much as I loved 'Harmonic Feedback', just in different ways. We've heard the story before: Teen gets kicked out of home because they're a disappointment to their parent/s. Teen goes off to fulfill their dream, whatever that may be. What really appealed to me though, was the musical aspects and the band and what the band brings to Jasmine, the protagonist.
The vision of Liberation, as described and taught in this book, is based on many years studying and practicing Zen Buddhism with an Asian master, many years working with Navajo (Dinè) traditional healers, and real-world application of these ideas from an awakened perspective. All of the principles of Liberation from the Lie have been rigorously tested and you are invited to test them in your own life.
I’m not sure at what time the American diet became infiltrated with supplemental sugar as I don’t know enough about the history of processed foods to know, for example, when we started adding sugar to ketchup, although I have to say it’s ironic to me that so many reduced fat or fat free foods either add sugar, HFCS or articifial sweeter, the latter two seeming the most evil. I would speculate that it was sometime after the industrial revolution/World War I/World War II, as more and more women were entering the workforce and were needing easier (read:quicker) ways to cook for their families, such as breakfast and dinner, make lunches for their children to take to school, bake nightly dessert, etc. But, that’s just my guess at this point. If that’s not the root cause, I’m sure it was a contributing factor, along with things like the invention of the microwave, which made it even easier to cook that processed food.
Look for the Mobile Mammography Van at:
One of the many tricks mentioned to boost your memory is to develop the capacity to quickly create multisensory images that will link disparate ideas. In fact, conjuring dirty images or funny jokes will better lock the memory as compared to sheer rote memorization.
"The object of the rakes, or internal machine, inside the tuns is to stir the "goods" or mash, to make them homogeneous as to consistency and it is useful for the draining operations afterwards. We noticed also that the tuns are each tapped by several cocks placed in the bottom of the mash-tun, the object being to secure an equal outflow. The sparging is to sprinkle the goods evenly all over for the purpose of still further securing this object. When the tuns are drawn off, the grains are made to fall through spouts direct into the farmers' carts, which are drawn up in the grains' shed beneath."
I did about every other flower, because I didn’t want it to be cluttered (except I’m lying and the real reason is there was no way in hell I was going to cut all those petals out! lol)
1 fadin'
This was near the top of my workflow wishlist for 2012. Thanks Microsoft!
The decor looks much different today (and in my opinion, more tasteful. Sorry Nick).
of my childhood days on the farm,
LET ME SHOW YOU MY NEW NAIL DESIGN. WOOOHOOO. CUPCAKE X ICECREAM INSPIRED. Hahaha. I did it myself, yes, that's right. ^^.
add remaining dry ingredients i..e cake flour and baking powder until well incorporated
I am not 100% certain Ill keep these....
Research and Style
